Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
OREGON HOUSING NEEDS ANALYSIS
SECTION 1. (1) There is established within the Oregon  Department of Administrative
Services the Oregon Housing  Needs Analysis. The purposes of the Oregon Housing Needs
Analysis are to further the:
(a) Production of housing  to meet the need of Oregonians at all levels of affordability;
and
(b) Production of housing in a way that creates more housing choice by affirmatively
furthering fair housing, as defined in ORS 197.290.
(2) The Oregon Housing Needs Analysis consists of three components as follows:
(a) The annual statewide housing analysis under section 2 (1) of this 2023 Act;
(b) The allocated housing need under section 2 (2) of this 2023 Act; and
(c) The housing production targets under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
(3) Actions taken by the department under  sections 1 to 3 of this 2023 Act are not subject
to ORS 197.180 and are not land use decisions.
(4) The Department of Land Conservation and Development and  the Housing and Com-
munity Services Department:
(a) Shall assist the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services with its duties under
sections 1 to 3 of this 2023 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 1
(b) May  study and recommend methodological changes to the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services to improve the Oregon Housing Needs  Analysis’ functions and suit-
ability for its purposes under subsection  (1) of this section. The departments may solicit
written and oral public testimony to inform their recommendations.
SECTION 2. (1) On  an annual basis the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
shall conduct a statewide housing analysis. The analysis must be conducted statewide and
segmented into regions as determined by the department.  The analysis shall estimate factors
including, but not limited to:
(a) Projected needed housing units over the next 20 years;
(b) Current housing underproduction;
(c) Housing units needed for people experiencing homelessness; and
(d) Housing units projected to be converted into vacation  homes or second homes during
the next 20 years.
(2) At the  time the department performs the housing analysis under subsection (1) of this
section, the department shall allocate a housing need for each city.
(3) In  making an allocation under subsection (2) of this section, the department shall
consider:
(a) The forecasted population growth under ORS 195.033 or 195.036;
(b) The forecasted regional job growth;
(c) An equitable statewide distribution of housing for income levels described in  sub-
section (4) of this section;
(d) The estimates made under subsection (1) of this section; and
(e) The purpose of the Oregon Housing Needs Analysis under section  1 (1) of this 2023
Act.
(4) In estimating and allocating housing need under this section,  the department shall
segment need by the following income levels:
(a) Housing affordable to households making less than 30 percent of median family  in-
come;
(b) Housing affordable to households making 30 percent or more and less than 60 percent
of median family income;
(c) Housing affordable to households making 60 percent or more and less than 80 percent
of median family income;
(d) Housing affordable to households making 80 percent or more and less than 120 per-
cent of median family income; and
(e) Housing affordable to households making 120 percent or more of median family in-
come.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall allocate housing
production targets to each city with a population of 10,000 or greater  and to each
unincorporated urbanized area within the Metro urban growth  boundary. Housing production
targets shall describe the  proportion of the allocated housing need that the department de-
termines should be produced in each city within six years  for a city or urbanized area inside
Metro and within eight years for a city or urbanized area outside Metro.
(2) The housing production targets must be separated into:
(a) A total target; and
(b) A target for publicly supported housing affordable to households making less than  80
percent of the median family income.
(3) In establishing housing production targets under this section, the department:
(a) May include a  greater proportion of the allocated housing need to accommodate peo-
ple experiencing homelessness and housing underproduction within a city;
(b) Is not required to consider allocation  of needed housing by Metro under ORS 197.296
or 197.303; and
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 2
(c) Shall coordinate the allocation of the targets with a schedule developed by  the De-
partment of Land Conservation and Development for requiring housing production  strategies
under ORS 197.290.
SECTION 4. (1) The Housing and Community Services Department may adopt rules to
implement this section and section 5 of this 2023 Act.
(2) On an annual  basis the Housing and Community Services Department shall update a
publicly available statewide housing production dashboard.
(3) The dashboard shall include, for each city with a population of 10,000 or greater:
(a) Progress toward housing production by  affordability levels, as described in section 2
(4) of this 2023 Act and total housing targets; and
(b) A comparative  analysis of progress in comparison to the region and other local gov-
ernments with similar market types.
(4) Information in the dashboard must be based on:
(a) Inventory of publicly supported housing, as defined in ORS 456.250, that is maintained
by the department; and
(b) Information submitted to the department under section 37 (3) of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1) On an annual basis  the Housing and Community Services Department
shall update publicly available statewide housing equity indicators.
(2) The indicators shall include, for each city,  quantifiable data, to the extent that the
department can determine, define or estimate it, displaying:
(a) Housing outcomes, such as cost burden and availability of housing  units to own or
to rent, and  housing condition for various demographics, including race or ethnicity, disa-
bility status, English proficiency and age;
(b) Housing types produced and overall land efficiency of housing production;
(c) New housing units built to standards,  as defined by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services by rule, relating to accessibility and visitability;
(d) Risk of gentrification and displacement;
(e) Housing segregation by race and income;
(f) Environmentally just housing outcomes, informed by the environmental justice map-
ping tool, developed by the Environmental Justice  Council under section 12, chapter 58,
Oregon Laws 2022;
(g) Residential tenants who spend more than  50 percent of their household income on
gross rent for housing; and
(h) Other measurable factors or indicators identified by the department.
SECTION 6.
(1) No later than March 1, 2024, the Department of  Land Conservation and
Development shall adopt  a housing production target schedule under section 3 (3)(c) of this
2023 Act.
(2) No later than January 1, 2025,  the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
shall:
(a) Conduct the initial statewide housing analysis and the  initial estimate and allocation
of housing need under section 2 of this 2023 Act.
(b) Establish the initial housing production targets under section 3 of this 2023 Act.
(3) No later than  January 1, 2025, the Housing and Community Services Department
shall:
(a) Publish the  statewide housing production dashboard under section 4 of this 2023 Act;
and
(b) Publish statewide housing equity indicators under section 5 of this 2023 Act.
(4) The schedule adopted by the Department of  Land Conservation and Development un-
der subsection (1) of this section is not a land use decisions and is not subject to appeal.
SECTION 7.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community  Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 3
1, 2023, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $1,202,432, to perform the duties of the de-
partment under sections 1 to 5 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 7a. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the amount of
$143,969 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts
and federal  funds received from charges, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in this section, collected or received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, for the Chief Operating Office, to perform the  duties of the department under
sections 1 to 5 of this 2023 Act.
URBANIZATION GENERALLY
SECTION 8.
(1) In adopting rules under ORS 197.286 to 197.314  and statewide planning
goals relating to  housing or urbanization, or administering the rules or statutes, the Land
Conservation and Development Commission and Department of Land Conservation  and De-
velopment shall be guided by the following principles:
(a) Housing that is safe, accessible  and affordable in the community of their choice
should be available to every Oregonian.
(b) Building enough equitable housing must be a top priority.
(c) The development and implementation of the housing  production strategy should be
the focal point by which the department collaborates with local governments to address and
eliminate local barriers to housing production.
(d) Expertise, technical assistance, model ordinances  and other tools and resources to
address housing production should be provided  to local governments, using cooperative
planning tools embodied in ORS 197.291 and 197.293, but not to the exclusion of the expedient
use of enforcement authority, including compliance orders under ORS 197.319 to 197.335.
(e) Housing production should  support fair and equitable housing outcomes, environ-
mental justice, climate resilience and access to opportunity.
(f) Housing production should not be undermined by litigation, regulatory  uncertainty or
repetitive or unnecessary procedures.
(g) Local governments, to the greatest extent possible, should  take actions within their
control to  facilitate the production of housing to meet housing production targets under
section 3 of this 2023 Act.
(2) Each public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, shall  use its authority to remove barriers
to, and to create pathways for, the development of needed housing and shall collaborate  with
the department and local governments to identify and implement strategies to  support
housing production where there is insufficient housing production and choice.
(3) In adopting rules implementing ORS 197.286  to 197.314 and statewide land use goals
relating to housing and urbanization, the commission may approve a range  of methodologies,
policy options or assumptions that a local government may adopt in determining:
(a) Needed housing;
(b) Housing production strategies or housing coordination strategies;
(c) Buildable lands or housing capacity;
(d) Amendments to urban growth boundaries,  including under ORS 197.296 (6)(a), 197.299,
197.764 and 197A.300 to 197A.325 and section 22 (5)(a) of this 2023 Act; or
(e) Adoption or amendments to urban reserves or  rural reserves under ORS 195.137 to
195.145.
SECTION 9.
(1) The  Land Conservation and Development Commission shall adopt rules
and amendments to rules related to urbanization as follows:
(a) On or before January 1, 2025, to implement ORS  197.290, 197.291, 197.293, 197.319 (4),
197.320 (13) and 197.335 (6); and
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 4
(b) On or before  January 1, 2026, to implement ORS 197.286 to 197.314, except as provided
in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) In adopting rules under this section, the commission shall prioritize:
(a) Facilitating and encouraging housing production, affordability and housing choice on
buildable lands within an urban growth boundary;
(b) Providing greater clarity  and certainty in the adoption and acknowledgement of
housing capacity analyses, urban growth boundary  amendments, urban growth boundary
exchanges or urban reserves to accommodate an identified housing need;
(c) Reducing analytical burden, minimizing procedural redundancy  and increasing legal
certainty for local  governments pursuing urban growth boundary amendments, urban growth
boundary exchanges or urban reserves where a housing need is identified, especially  for
smaller cities, consistent with the appropriate protection of resource lands; and
(d) Supporting coordinated public facilities planning, annexation, and comprehensive plan
amendments to facilitate the development of lands brought into an urban growth boundary.
(3) In adopting rules under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the commission shall:
(a) Consult with the Housing and Community Services  Department, Department of
Transportation, Department of Environmental Quality, Department of  State Lands, Oregon
Business Development Department and Department of Consumer and Business Services;
(b) Provide clear parameters on the types and extent of actions needed or allowed  under
ORS 197.290 (3) that are consistent with the technical  and resource capacities of varying
sizes of local governments; and
(c) Recognize actions already taken by local governments.
(4) To avoid interference with current planning activities or to avoid unjust or  surprising
results, the Land Conservation and Development Commission  may postpone, for cities spec-
ified by the commission, the applicability of sections 13, 21, 22 or 23 of this 2023 Act and  the
amendments to ORS 197.286, 197.290, 197.296, 197.297  and 197.303, by sections 12 and 25 to 28
of this 2023 Act, until a date that is not later than January 1, 2026.
SECTION 10.
The Department of Land Conservation and Development may provide
technical assistance and award grants to local governments  to enable them to implement the
provisions of ORS 197.286 to 197.314 and to take other actions  to incentivize the production
of needed housing within the jurisdiction of the local government.
SECTION 11. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Land Conservation  and Development, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $3,500,000, to provide technical
assistance and award grants under section 10 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 11a. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development by section 1 (1),
chapter 438, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for the planning pro-
gram, is increased by $100,560 to adopt rules and to  work on housing production strategies
and targets as provided in this 2023 Act.
SECTION 11b. In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Department of Land Conservation  and Development, for the biennium begin-
ning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,675,884, to adopt rules and to
work on housing production strategies and targets as provided in this 2023 Act.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 197.286, as amended by section 5, chapter 54, Oregon Laws  2022, is amended
to read:
197.286. As used in ORS 197.286 to 197.314 and 197.475 to 197.490:
(1) “Allocated housing need” means:
(a) For a city outside Metro,  the housing need allocated to a city under section 2 (2) of
this 2023 Act as segmented by income level under section 2 (4) of this 2023 Act; or
(b) For a  city within Metro, the housing need allocated to the city by Metro under ORS
197.303 (3).
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 5
[(1)] (2)  “Buildable lands” means lands in urban and urbanizable areas that are suitable,  avail-
able and necessary for  [ residential uses. “Buildable lands” includes ] the development of needed
housing over  a 20-year planning period, including  both vacant land and developed land likely to
be redeveloped.
[(2)] (3)  “Government assisted housing” means housing that is financed in whole or part by  ei-
ther a federal or state housing agency  or a housing authority as defined in ORS 456.005, or housing
that is occupied  by a tenant or tenants who benefit from rent supplements or housing vouchers
provided by either a federal or state housing agency or a local housing authority.
(4) “Housing capacity” means the number of needed housing units that can be developed
on buildable lands within the 20-year planning period based on the land’s comprehensive plan
designation and capacity for housing development and redevelopment.
(5) “Housing production strategy” means a strategy adopted by  a local government to
promote housing production under ORS 197.290.
[(3)] (6)  “Manufactured dwelling,” “manufactured dwelling park,”  “manufactured home” and
“mobile home park” have the meanings given those terms in ORS 446.003.
[(4)] (7) “Periodic review” means the process and procedures as set  forth in ORS 197.628 to
197.651.
[(5)] (8)  “Prefabricated structure” means a prefabricated structure, as defined in ORS 455.010,
that is relocatable, more than eight and one-half feet wide  and designed for use as a single-family
dwelling.
[(6) “Urban growth boundary” means an urban growth  boundary included or referenced in a
comprehensive plan.]
SECTION 13. (1) At the time that a city is required to inventory  its buildable lands under
ORS 197.297 (1) or section 21 or 22 of this 2023 Act, the local government shall determine the
amount of buildable lands that are  likely to support the production of housing during the
period of their housing production target under section 3 (1) of  this section, because the
lands are:
(a) Currently annexed and zoned to allow housing  through clear and objective standards
and procedures;
(b) Readily served through adjacent public facilities  or identified for the near-term pro-
vision of public facilities through an adopted capital improvement plan; and
(c) Not encumbered by any applicable local, state  or federal protective regulations or
have appropriate entitlements to prepare the land for development.
(2) If the total housing production target  is greater than the housing capacity of
development-ready lands, the local government shall take any actions in ORS 197.290 (3) that
demonstrably prepare lands for development or redevelopment or  increase the housing ca-
pacity of existing development-ready lands.
HOUSING PRODUCTION ACCOUNTABILITY
SECTION 14.
 ORS 197.293 is amended to read:
197.293. [ (1) The Land Conservation and Development  Commission, in consultation with the
Housing and  Community Services Department, shall adopt criteria for reviewing and identifying cities
with a population greater than 10,000 that have not sufficiently: ]
[(a) Achieved production of needed housing within their jurisdiction; or ]
[(b) Implemented a housing production strategy adopted under ORS 197.290. ]
[(2) The criteria adopted by the commission under subsection (1) of  this section may include the
city’s: ]
[(a) Unmet housing need as described in ORS 197.296 (6); ]
[(b) Unmet housing need in proportion to the city’s population; ]
[(c) Percentage of households identified as severely rent burdened as described in ORS 456.586; ]
[(d) Recent housing development; ]
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 6
[(e) Recent  adoption of a housing production strategy under ORS 197.290 or adoption of actions
pursuant to a housing production strategy; ]
[(f) Recent or frequent previous  identification by the Department of Land Conservation and Devel-
opment under this section; or ]
[(g) Other attributes that the commission considers relevant. ]
[(3) The Department of Land Conservation  and Development may review cities under the criteria
adopted under subsection (2) of  this section for the purposes of prioritizing actions by the department,
including:]
[(a) Awarding available technical or financial resources; ]
[(b) Providing enhanced review and oversight of the city’s housing production strategy; ]
[(c) Requiring a report and explanation if a city does not implement an action within  the approxi-
mate time frame scheduled within a housing production strategy; ]
[(d) Entering into agreements with the city  relating to the city’s modification or implementation of
its housing production strategy; or ]
[(e) Petitioning the  commission to act under ORS 197.319 to 197.335 to require the city to comply
with ORS 197.286 to 197.314 or statewide  land use planning goals related to housing or
urbanization.]
(1) In developing and  implementing this section and performing its duties under ORS
197.319 (4), the Department of Land Conservation and  Development shall be guided by section
8 (1) of this 2023 Act and the following principles:
(a) Increasing housing production;
(b) Developing affordable and equitable housing;
(c) Forming partnerships with cities and with other public bodies;
(d) Responding proportionately to housing underproduction;
(e) Escalating enforcement to address  persistent, repeated or deliberate noncompliance
with housing production targets; and
(f) Considering the availability of state resources to support housing production.
(2)(a) In determining whether a  city should be referred under subsection (3) of this sec-
tion, the  department may base its evaluation on the relative performance of a city based on
any one of, or any combination of, the following:
(A) A city’s progress proportionate to  its population size, as demonstrated by the state-
wide housing production dashboard under section 4 of this 2023 Act.
(B) The city’s performance as demonstrated by a  statewide housing equity indicator un-
der section 5 of this 2023 Act.
(b) The department may not base a determination made under this subsection solely on
a city’s performance on any single equity indicator.
(3) Each year, the department shall  refer into its housing acceleration program, under
subsection (4) of this section:
(a) For  each region, as established in the Oregon Housing Needs Analysis under section
1 (1) of this 2023 Act, of those cities that adopted a housing production strategy more than
three but less than four years ago, including as required by subsection (7)(a)  of this section,
the lowest performing cities, if any exist, as determined  under subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Each city that has failed  to adopt a housing production strategy by the deadline under
ORS 197.290 (1);
(c) Each city that has failed to undertake actions  in its housing production strategy by
the deadline under ORS 197.290 (4); and
(d) Cities referred under ORS 197.319 (4).
(4) For each city referred to  the housing acceleration program, within six months, the
department shall, in  cooperation with the city, complete an audit of specific housing barriers,
that must  include an analysis of the following factors affecting housing production,
affordability and choice:
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 7
(a) The existing housing production strategy  and the documents and record supporting
the strategy;
(b) Public written comments and invited stakeholder feedback received by a date specified
by the department;
(c) Land use planning regulations, including zoning and development code;
(d) Permitting and approval processes relating  to development of housing and
infrastructure supporting housing;
(e) Required fees, exactions and improvements;
(f) Actions and inactions that can impact fair and equitable housing outcomes,  environ-
mental justice, climate resilience and location choice;
(g) Local resource deficiencies, including staffing, public facilities, capital  improvements
to infrastructure, availability of buildable lands  and actions or investments to prepare land
for development;
(h) Specific additional state resources that could support housing production;
(i) Changes to state laws or rules or  the regulations, policies, actions or inactions of any
public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, as that could impact housing production; and
(j) Other factors limiting housing that are not within the city’s control.
(5) In performing an audit under subsection (4) of this section, the department:
(a) May request concurrent review of the city’s affordability policies  under ORS 197.637;
and
(b) Shall notify any public body identified under subsection (4)(j) of this section.
(6) Within six months following an audit under subsection (4) of  this section, the city and
the department must enter into a housing acceleration agreement that is based on  and
proportionate to the city’s basis for referral under subsection (3) of this section and informed
by the audit under subsection (4) of this section.
(7) Under the housing acceleration agreement, the department shall agree to provide:
(a) Specified technical assistance, regulatory support and other assistance, to  assist the
city in performing its agreement under subsection (8) of this section;
(b) Specific funding under the department’s control; and
(c) Specified assistance in pursuing other state or public funds.
(8) Under the housing acceleration agreement, the city shall agree to:
(a) If the department determines  that the factors affecting housing production,
affordability and choice are  a consequence of policies and practices that are directly within
the city’s control, adopt an amended housing production  strategy within six months that
includes:
(A) A timeline for performance under ORS 197.290 (4) of no less than one year; and
(B) Specified actions which may include, but are not limited to:
(i) Actions under ORS 197.290 (3);
(ii) Dedicating  funds for increased local capacity to facilitate housing production,
affordability and choice;
(iii) Dedicating funds for public facilities and infrastructure  necessary to support housing
production;
(iv) Taking measures that increase  the availability of development-ready land as de-
scribed in section 13 of this 2023 Act;
(v) Amending the development code,  approval criteria or procedures to reduce cost or
delay to housing production; and
(vi) Taking emergency temporary measures to support housing production; and
(b) Join any department initiated interagency  mediation to identify policies and resources
that would support housing production in the city.
(9) The department may require that a city that is not required  to adopt an amendment
to its housing production strategy under subsection (8)(a)  of this section include findings at
the time that the city  is next required to adopt a housing production strategy under ORS
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 8
197.290 (1) that describe how the city has addressed the audit’s findings and any suggested
actions.
(10) The department may grant limited extensions to deadlines under subsections  (3)(b)
and (c) and (8)(a) of this section for emergencies, good cause or other factors outside of  the
city’s control.
(11) The actions by a city  or department under this section are not land use decisions
and are not subject to appeal or review.
(12) All public bodies, as defined in ORS 174.109, are directed to  assist cities and the de-
partment in the performance of their duties under this  section and to take timely action to
ensure that the agency’s rules or policies  do not unduly delay implementation of a housing
acceleration agreement under this section.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 197.319 is amended to read:
197.319. (1) Before a person may request adoption of an enforcement order under ORS 197.320,
the person shall:
(a) Present the reasons, in writing, for such an order to the affected local government; and
(b) Request:
(A) Revisions to the local comprehensive plan, land use regulations,  special district cooperative
or urban service agreement or decision-making process which is the basis for the order; or
(B) That an action be taken regarding the local comprehensive plan, land use  regulations, spe-
cial district agreement, housing production strategy or decision-making  process that is the basis for
the order.
(2)(a) The local government or special district shall issue a  written response to the request
within 60 days of the date the request is mailed to the local government or special district.
(b) The requestor and the  local government or special district may enter into mediation to re-
solve issues in the request. The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall provide
mediation services when jointly requested by the local government or  special district and the
requestor.
(c) If the local government or special district does not act in a  manner which the requestor
believes  is  adequate to address the issues raised in the request within the time period provided in
paragraph (a)  of this subsection, a petition may be presented to the Land Conservation and Devel-
opment Commission under ORS 197.324.
(3) A metropolitan service district may request an enforcement order under ORS  197.320 (12)
without first complying with subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(4) The department, without the prior approval  of the commission, may request an
enforcement order under ORS 197.320 (13) without first complying with subsections (1)  and
(2) of this section. Notwithstanding  ORS 183.635 (2) and 197.328 (1), the request under this
subsection must be assigned to an administrative law judge appointed  under ORS 183.635
unless the commission  has previously appointed a hearing officer or a pool of hearing officers
to review petitions filed under this section. Before the  entry of a final order under ORS
197.319 to 197.335, the department, in its discretion, may dismiss a petition filed by the  de-
partment under this section and refer a city to the housing acceleration program under  ORS
197.293.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 197.320 is amended to read:
197.320. The Land Conservation and Development Commission shall issue an order  requiring a
local government, state agency or special district to take action necessary to  bring its comprehen-
sive plan, land use regulation, limited land use decisions or  other land use decisions or actions into
compliance with the goals, acknowledged comprehensive plan provisions, land use  regulations , [ or]
housing production strategy or housing acceleration agreements  if the commission has good
cause to believe:
(1) A comprehensive plan or land use regulation adopted by a local government not on a com-
pliance schedule is not in compliance with the goals by the date set in ORS  197.245 or 197.250 for
such compliance[ ;].
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 9
(2) A plan, program, rule or  regulation affecting land use adopted by a state agency or special
district is not in compliance with the goals by the date set in ORS 197.245 or 197.250 for such
compliance[ ;].
(3) A  local government is not making satisfactory progress toward performance of its compliance
schedule[ ;].
(4) A state agency  is not making satisfactory progress in carrying out its coordination agree-
ment or the requirements of ORS 197.180[ ;].
(5) A local government has no comprehensive plan or land use  regulation and is not on a com-
pliance schedule directed to developing the plan or regulation[ ;].
(6) A local government has engaged  in a pattern or practice of decision making that violates
an acknowledged  comprehensive plan or land use regulation. In making its determination under this
subsection, the commission shall determine whether there is evidence in the record to  support the
decisions made. The  commission shall not judge the issue solely upon adequacy of the findings in
support of the decisions[ ;].
(7) A local  government has failed to comply with a commission order entered under ORS
197.644[;].
(8) A special district has engaged in a pattern or practice of decision-making  that violates an
acknowledged comprehensive plan or cooperative agreement adopted pursuant to ORS 197.020[ ;].
(9) A special district is not making satisfactory progress toward performance of its obligations
under ORS chapters 195 and 197[ ;].
(10) A local government’s approval standards, special conditions on approval  of specific devel-
opment proposals or procedures for approval do not comply with ORS 197.307 (4) or (6)[ ;].
(11) A local  government is not making satisfactory progress toward meeting its obligations un-
der ORS 195.065[ ;].
(12) A local government within the jurisdiction of a  metropolitan service district has failed to
make changes to the comprehensive plan or land use  regulations to comply with the regional
framework plan of the district or has engaged in a  pattern or practice of decision-making that vio-
lates a requirement of the regional framework plan[ ; or ].
(13) A city  [ is not making satisfactory progress in taking actions listed in its housing production
strategy under ORS 197.290. ] with a population of 10,000 or greater that:
(a) Has a pattern or practice of violating housing-related statutes or implementing  poli-
cies that create  additional, unnecessary cost or delay to affordable or market-rate housing
production;
(b) Has a pattern or practice of creating adverse disparate impacts to  state or federal
protected classes  or inhibiting equitable access to housing choice, as described in ORS 197.290
(2)(b) to (d);
(c) Has failed to  enter into a housing acceleration agreement as required under ORS
197.293 (6); or
(d) Has materially breached a  term of a housing acceleration agreement under ORS
197.293 (8),  including a failure to meet the timeline for performance under ORS 197.293
(8)(a)(A).
SECTION 17.
 ORS 197.335 is amended to read:
197.335. (1) An order issued under ORS 197.328 and the copy of the order mailed to the local
government, state agency or special district [ shall] must  set forth:
(a) The nature  of the noncompliance, including, but not limited to, the contents of the compre-
hensive plan or land  use regulation, if any, of a local government that do not comply with the goals
or the contents of a plan, program  or regulation affecting land use adopted by a state agency or
special district that do not  comply with the goals. In the case of a pattern or practice of decision-
making [ which violates the goals, comprehensive plan or land use regulations,  the order shall ], the
order must  specify the  decision-making [ which] that constitutes the pattern or practice, including
specific provisions the Land Conservation and Development Commission believes  are being
misapplied[;].
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 10
(b) The specific lands, if any, within a local government for which  the existing plan or land use
regulation, if any, does not comply with the goals[ ; and ].
(c) The corrective  action decided upon by the commission, including the specific requirements,
with which the local government, state agency or  special district must comply. In the case of a
pattern or  practice of decision-making [ that violates an acknowledged comprehensive plan or land use
regulation], the commission may require revisions to the comprehensive plan, land use  regulations
or local procedures which the commission  believes are necessary to correct the pattern or practice.
Notwithstanding the provisions of this  section, except as provided in subsection (3)(c) of this section,
an enforcement order does not affect:
(A) Land use applications filed with a local government prior to the  date of adoption of the
enforcement order unless specifically identified by the order;
(B) Land use approvals issued by a local government prior to the date of adoption  of the
enforcement order; or
(C) The time limit for exercising land use approvals issued by a local government prior  to the
date of adoption of the enforcement order.
(2) Judicial review of a final order of the commission [ shall be ] is governed by the  provisions
of ORS chapter 183  applicable to contested cases except as otherwise stated in this section. The
commission’s final order [ shall] must  include a clear statement of findings which set forth the basis
for the order. Where a petition to review the order has been filed in  the Court of Appeals, the
commission shall transmit to the court the entire administrative record of the proceeding under  re-
view. Notwithstanding ORS 183.482 (3) relating to a stay of enforcement of an agency order, an ap-
pellate court, before it may stay an order of the commission, shall give due consideration  to the
public interest in the continued enforcement of the commission’s order and  may consider testimony
or affidavits thereon. Upon review, an appellate court may affirm, reverse, modify  or remand the
order. The court shall reverse, modify or remand the order only if it finds:
(a) The order to be  unlawful in substance or procedure, but  an  error in procedure [ shall not
be] is not  cause for reversal,  modification or remand unless the court [ shall find ] finds that sub-
stantial rights of any party were prejudiced thereby;
(b) The order to be unconstitutional;
(c) The order is invalid because it exceeds the statutory authority of the agency; or
(d) The order is not supported by substantial evidence in the whole record.
(3)(a) If the commission finds that in the interim period during which a  local government, state
agency or special district would be bringing itself into compliance  with the commission’s order un-
der ORS 197.320 or subsection (2) of  this section it would be contrary to the public interest in the
conservation or sound development of  land to allow the continuation of some or all categories of
land use decisions or limited land use decisions, it shall, as part of  its order, limit, prohibit or re-
quire the approval by  the local government of applications for subdivisions, partitions, building
permits, limited land use decisions or land use  decisions until the plan, land use regulation or sub-
sequent land use decisions and limited land use decisions are brought into compliance. The com-
mission may issue an order that requires review of local decisions  by a hearings officer or the
Department of Land Conservation and Development before the local decision becomes final.
(b) Any requirement  under this subsection may be imposed only if the commission finds that the
activity, if continued,  aggravates the goal, comprehensive plan or land use regulation violation and
that the requirement is necessary to correct the violation.
(c) The limitations on enforcement orders under subsection (1)(c)(B) of this section [ shall not  be
interpreted to ] does not  affect the  commission’s authority to limit, prohibit or require application
of specified criteria to subsequent land use decisions involving land use approvals issued  by a local
government prior to the date of adoption of the enforcement order.
(4) As part of its order under ORS  197.320 or subsection (2) of this section, the commission may
withhold grant funds from the local government to which the order is directed. As part of  an order
issued under this section, the commission may notify the  officer responsible for disbursing state-
shared revenues to withhold that portion of state-shared revenues to which the  local government is
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 11
entitled under ORS 221.770, 323.455, 366.762 and 366.800 and ORS chapter 471 which  represents the
amount of state planning grant moneys previously  provided the local government by the commission.
The officer responsible for disbursing state-shared revenues shall withhold state-shared revenues  as
outlined in this section and shall release funds to the local government or department when  notified
to so do by the commission or its designee. The commission may retain a portion of  the withheld
revenues to cover costs of providing services incurred under the order, including  use of a hearings
officer or staff resources to monitor  land use decisions and limited land use decisions or conduct
hearings. The remainder of the funds withheld under this  provision shall be released to the local
government upon completion of requirements of the commission order.
(5)(a) As part of its order under this  section, the commission may notify the officer responsible
for disbursing funds from any grant or loan made  by a state agency to withhold such funds from a
special district to which the order is directed. The officer responsible for disbursing funds shall
withhold funds as outlined in this section and shall release funds to  the special district or depart-
ment when notified to do so by the commission.
(b) The commission may retain a portion of the funds withheld to cover  costs of providing ser-
vices incurred under the order, including use of a hearings officer or staff  resources to monitor land
use decisions and limited land use decisions  or conduct hearings. The remainder of the funds with-
held under this provision shall be released  to the special district upon completion of the require-
ments of the commission order.
(6) As part of its order under this section, upon finding a city failed  to comply with ORS
197.320 (13), the commission  may, consistent with the principles in ORS 197.293 (1), require
the city to:
(a) Comply with the housing acceleration agreement under ORS 197.293 (6).
(b) Take specific actions that are part of the city’s housing production strategy under
ORS 197.290.
(c) Impose appropriate models that have  been developed by department, including model
ordinances, procedures, actions or anti-displacement measures.
(d) Reduce maximum timelines for review of needed housing or specific types of housing
or affordability levels, including through  ministerial approval or any other expedited existing
approval process.
(e) Take specific actions to waive or amend local ordinances.
(f) Forfeit grant funds under subsection (4) of this section.
[(6)] (7) The commission may institute actions or proceedings for legal or equitable remedies  in
the Circuit Court for Marion County  or in the circuit court for the county to which the
commission’s order is directed or within which all or a portion of the applicable city is located  to
enforce compliance with the provisions of any order issued under this section or to restrain  vio-
lations thereof. Such actions or  proceedings may be instituted without the necessity of prior agency
notice, hearing and order on an alleged violation.
SECTION 18.
The amendments to ORS 197.293, 197.319, 197.320 and 197.335 by sections 14
to 17 of this 2023 Act become operative on January 1, 2025.
SECTION 19. The Department of Land Conservation and  Development and Land Conser-
vation and  Development Commission may take any actions necessary before the operative
date specified in section 18 necessary to exercise, on and after the operative date specified
in section 18 of this 2023 Act,  all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the de-
partment and commission under the  amendments to ORS 197.293, 197.319, 197.320 and 197.335
by sections 14 to 17 of this 2023 Act.
URBANIZATION OUTSIDE METRO
SECTION 20. Sections 8, 13 and 21 to  23 of this 2023 Act are added to and made a part
of ORS 197.286 to 197.314.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 12
SECTION 21. (1) This section applies only to  cities that are not within Metro or described
in section 22 (1) of this 2023 Act.
(2) The actions required under subsection (3) of this section must be undertaken:
(a) At periodic review pursuant to ORS 197.628 to 197.651;
(b) On a schedule established by  the Land Conservation and Development Commission for
cities with a population of 10,000 or greater, not to exceed once each eight years;
(c) At any other legislative review of  the comprehensive plan that requires the applica-
tion of a statewide planning goal related to buildable lands for residential use; or
(d) At the election of a city with a population of less than 10,000.
(3) A city shall, according to rules of the commission:
(a) Determine its needed housing under section 23 of this 2023 Act;
(b) Inventory the supply of buildable lands available within  the urban growth boundary
to accommodate needed housing; and
(c) Take any necessary actions described in ORS 197.290 (3), whether or not the actions
are described within the city’s housing production strategy,  to accommodate needed housing.
SECTION 22.
(1) This section applies only to local governments with  jurisdiction over
lands inside the urban growth boundary of:
(a) Cities located outside Metro with a population of 25,000 or greater; and
(b) Cities that meet factors established by Land Conservation and  Development Com-
mission in consideration of  the city’s size, rate of population growth or proximity to another
city with a population of 25,000 or greater or to Metro.
(2) A local government shall determine its needed housing  under section 23 of this 2023
Act and inventory its buildable lands and determine the lands’ housing capacity under  this
section:
(a) At periodic review under ORS 197.628 to 197.651;
(b) As scheduled by the commission at least once each eight years; or
(c) At any  other legislative review of the comprehensive plan that concerns the urban
growth boundary  and requires the application of a statewide planning goal related to
buildable lands for residential use.
(3) For the purpose of determining housing capacity and inventory  of buildable lands
under subsection (2) of this section:
(a) “Buildable lands” includes:
(A) Vacant lands planned or zoned for residential use;
(B) Partially vacant lands planned or zoned for residential use;
(C) Lands that may be used for a mix of  residential and employment uses under the ex-
isting planning or zoning; and
(D) Lands that may be used for residential infill or redevelopment.
(b) The local government shall consider:
(A) The extent that residential development is  prohibited or restricted by local regulation
and ordinance, state law and rule or federal statute and regulation;
(B) A written long term contract or  easement for radio, telecommunications or electrical
facilities, if the written contract or easement is provided to the local government; and
(C) The presence of a single family dwelling or other structure on a lot or parcel.
(c) Except for land that may be used for residential infill or redevelopment, the local
government shall create a map or document that may be used to verify and  identify specific
lots or parcels that have been determined to be buildable lands.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of  this subsection, the determination
of housing capacity must be based on data related to land within the urban growth boundary
that has been collected since the last review under subsection (2)(b) of this section. The  data
must include:
(A) The number,  density and average mix of housing types of urban residential develop-
ment that have actually been developed;
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 13
(B) Trends in density and average mix of housing types of  urban residential development;
(C) Market factors that may substantially impact future urban residential development;
(D) The number, density and average mix of housing types that have been developed on
buildable lands;
(E) Consideration of the effects of the  adopted housing production strategy and measures
taken and reasonably anticipated to be taken to implement the strategy; and
(F) Consideration of factors that influence available housing supply, including short-term
rentals, second homes and vacation homes.
(b) A local government shall make  the determination described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection using data from a shorter time period than the time period described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection if  the local government finds that the shorter time period will provide
more accurate  and reliable data related to housing capacity. The shorter time period may
not be less than three years.
(c) A local government shall use data from a wider geographic area or use  a time period
longer than the time period described in paragraph (a) of this subsection if the analysis of
a wider geographic area or the use of data from a longer time period will  provide more ac-
curate, complete and reliable data related to  trends affecting housing need than an analysis
performed pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection. The local government must  clearly
describe the geographic area, time frame and source of data used in a determination per-
formed under this paragraph.
(5) If the needed housing is greater  than the housing capacity, the local government shall
take one or both of  the following actions to accommodate allocated housing need for the next
20 years:
(a) Amend its urban growth boundary to include  sufficient buildable lands to accommo-
date allocated housing need for the next 20  years consistent with the requirements of ORS
197A.320 and statewide planning goals. As part of this process, the local government shall
consider the effects of actions taken pursuant to paragraph (b) of this  subsection. The
amendment must include sufficient land reasonably  necessary to accommodate the siting of
new public school facilities. The need and inclusion of lands for new  public school facilities
must be a coordinated process between the affected public school districts  and the local
government that has the authority to approve the urban growth boundary.
(b) Take any action under ORS 197.290 (3),  whether or not the action was described in
an approved housing production strategy,  that demonstrably increases housing capacity or
produces additional needed housing.  Actions under this paragraph may include amending a
comprehensive plan or land use regulations to include new  measures that demonstrably in-
crease the likelihood that  residential development will occur at densities sufficient to ac-
commodate needed housing for the next 20 years  without expansion of the urban growth
boundary.
(6) A local government that takes any actions under subsection (5) of this section shall:
(a) Demonstrate that the comprehensive plan and land use regulations comply with  goals
and rules adopted by the commission.
(b) Adopt findings regarding the changes in housing capacity assumed to  result from
actions adopted based on data  collected under subsection (4)(a) of this section. The density
expectations may not project an increase in  residential capacity above achieved density by
more than three percent without quantifiable validation  of such departures. A quantifiable
validation must demonstrate that the assumed housing capacity has been achieved in  areas
that are zoned to  allow no greater than the same authorized density level, as defined in ORS
227.175, within the local government’s jurisdiction or a jurisdiction in the same region.
(c) In  establishing that actions adopted under subsection (5) of this section demonstrably
increase housing capacity, ensure that buildable  lands are in locations appropriate for needed
housing, are zoned at density ranges that are likely to be achieved  by the housing market
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 14
and are in  areas where sufficient urban services are planned to enable the higher density
development to occur over the 20-year period.
SECTION 23. (1) As used in  ORS 197.286 to 197.314, and except as provided in subsection
(2) of this section:
(a) “Needed housing” means housing by affordability level, as described in section  2 (4)
of this 2023 Act, type, characteristics and location that is necessary to accommodate  the
city’s allocated  housing need over the 20-year planning period in effect when the city’s
housing capacity is determined.
(b) “Needed housing” includes the following housing types:
(A) Detached single-family housing, middle housing types as described in  ORS 197.758 and
multifamily housing that is owned or rented;
(B) Government assisted housing;
(C) Mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks as provided in ORS 197.475 to 197.490;
(D) Manufactured homes on individual lots planned and zoned for single-family residential
use that are in addition to lots within designated manufactured dwelling subdivisions;
(E) Housing for agricultural workers;
(F) Housing  for individuals with a variety of disabilities, related to mobility or commu-
nications that require accessibility features;
(G) Housing for older persons, as defined in ORS 659A.421; and
(H) Housing for college or university students, if relevant to the region.
(2) Subsection (1)(b)(A) and (D) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A city with a population of less than 2,500.
(b) A county with a population of less than 15,000.
(3) At the time that a city is required to inventory its buildable lands under ORS  197.297
(1) or section 21 or 22 of this 2023 Act, the city shall determine its  needed housing under this
section.
(4) In determining needed housing the city must demonstrate that the  projected housing
types, characteristics and locations are:
(a) Attainable for the allocated housing need by income, including  consideration of pub-
licly supported housing;
(b) Appropriately responsive to current and projected market trends; and
(c) Responsive to the factors in ORS 197.290 (2)(b) to (d).
SECTION 24.
 ORS 197A.320 is amended to read:
197A.320. (1) [ Notwithstanding the priority in  ORS 197.298 for inclusion of land within an urban
growth boundary, ] A city outside [ of] Metro shall comply with this section when determining  which
lands to  include within the urban growth boundary of the city , including when amending an urban
growth boundary under ORS  [ pursuant to ORS 197.286 to 197.314, ] 197A.310 or 197A.312  or sec-
tion 22 (5)(a) of this 2023 Act .
(2) The Land Conservation and Development Commission shall provide, by rule, that:
(a) When evaluating lands for inclusion within the urban growth boundary, the city shall  es-
tablish a  study area that includes all land that is contiguous to the urban growth boundary and
within a distance specified by commission.
(b) The city shall evaluate all land in the study area for  inclusion in the urban growth boundary
as provided in subsection (4) of this section, except for land excluded from the study area because:
(A) It is impracticable, as provided in subsection (3) of this section,  to provide necessary public
facilities or services to the land.
(B) The land  is subject to significant development hazards, including a risk of land slides, a risk
of flooding because  the land is within the 100-year floodplain or is subject to inundation during
storm surges or tsunamis, and other risks determined by the commission.
(C) The long-term preservation of significant scenic, natural,  cultural or recreational resources
requires limiting or prohibiting urban development of the land that contains the resources.
(D) The land is owned by the federal government and managed primarily for rural uses.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 15
(E) The land is designated as rural reserve under ORS 195.137 to 195.145.
(c) When evaluating the priority of land for inclusion under paragraph (b) of this subsection:
(A) The city shall evaluate  the land within the study area that is designated as an urban reserve
under ORS 195.145 in an acknowledged comprehensive plan[ ,].
(B) If the amount of  land appropriate for selection under subparagraph (A) of this para-
graph is not sufficient to satisfy the need for the land, the city  shall evaluate the  land that
is subject to  an acknowledged exception under ORS 197.732 or land that is nonresource land and
select as much of the land as necessary to satisfy the need for land using criteria  established by the
commission and criteria in an acknowledged comprehensive plan and land use regulations.
[(B)] (C)  If the amount of land appropriate for selection under [ subparagraph (A) ] subpara-
graphs (A) and (B)  of this paragraph is not sufficient to satisfy the need for land, the city  shall
evaluate the land within the study area that is designated  as marginal land under ORS 197.247 (1991
Edition) in the acknowledged comprehensive plan and select as much of the  land as necessary to
satisfy the need for land using criteria established by the commission and criteria in an  acknowl-
edged comprehensive plan and land use regulations.
[(C)] (D)  If the amount of land  appropriate for selection under subparagraphs (A) [ and (B) ] to
(C) of this paragraph is not sufficient to satisfy the amount of land  needed, the city shall evaluate
land within the study area that is designated for agriculture or forest  uses in the acknowledged
comprehensive plan that  is not predominantly high-value farmland, as defined in ORS 195.300, or
does not consist predominantly of prime or unique soils, as determined by the United  States De-
partment of Agriculture Natural Resources Conservation Service, and select as much of  that land
as necessary to satisfy the need for land:
(i) Using criteria established by  the commission and criteria in an acknowledged comprehensive
plan and land use regulations; and
(ii) Using the predominant capability classification system or the predominant cubic  site class,
as appropriate for the acknowledged  comprehensive plan designation, to select lower capability or
cubic site class lands first.
[(D)] (E)  If the amount of land appropriate for selection under subparagraphs (A) to [ (C)] (D)
of this paragraph is not sufficient to satisfy the need for land, the city  shall evaluate land within
the study area  that is designated as agricultural land in an acknowledged comprehensive plan and
is predominantly high value farmland  and select as much of that land as necessary to satisfy the
need for land. A local government may not select land that is  predominantly made up of prime or
unique farm soils, as defined by the  United States Department of Agriculture Natural Resources
Conservation Service, unless there is an insufficient amount of other land to satisfy its land need.
(3) For purposes of subsection (2)(b)(A) of this section,  the commission shall determine
impracticability by rule, considering the likely amount of development that could occur  on the lands
within the planning period, the likely cost of facilities and services, physical, topographical or other
impediments to service provision and whether urban development has occurred on similarly  situated
lands such that it is likely that  the lands will be developed at an urban level during the planning
period. When impracticability is primarily a result of existing development patterns, the rules of the
commission shall require that the lands be included within the study area, but  may allow the de-
velopment capacity forecast for the  lands to be specified at a lower level over the planning period.
The rules of the commission must be based on an evaluation of how similarly  situated lands have,
or have not, developed over time.
(4) For purposes of subsection (2)(b)(C) of this section, the commission by rule shall determine
the circumstances in which and the resources to which this exclusion will apply.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection [ (2)(c)(D)] (2)(c)(E) of  this section, the rules must allow land that
would otherwise be excluded from an urban growth boundary to be included if:
(a) The land contains a small amount of resource  land that is not important to the commercial
agricultural enterprise in the area and the land must be included to connect a nearby and signif-
icantly larger area of land of higher priority for inclusion within the urban growth boundary; or
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 16
(b) The land contains a small amount of resource land that  is not predominantly high-value
farmland or predominantly made up of prime or unique farm soils and the land is completely sur-
rounded by land of higher priority for inclusion into the urban growth boundary.
(6) When the primary purpose for  expansion of the urban growth boundary is to accommodate
a particular industry use that requires  specific site characteristics, or to accommodate a public fa-
cility that requires specific site characteristics and the site characteristics  may be found in only a
small number of locations, the city may limit the study area to land that has, or could  be improved
to provide, the required  site characteristics. Lands included within an urban growth boundary for
a particular industrial  use, or a particular public facility, must remain planned and zoned for the
intended use:
(a) Except as allowed by rule of the commission that  is based on a significant change in cir-
cumstance or the passage of time; or
(b) Unless the city removes the land from within the urban growth boundary.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the commission may  adopt rules that
specify circumstances under which a city may  exchange land within the urban growth boundary of
the city for land that is outside of the urban growth boundary and that is designed to avoid adverse
effects of an exchange on agricultural or forest operations in the surrounding area.
METRO URBANIZATION
SECTION 25.
 ORS 197.296 is amended to read:
197.296. (1) This section applies only to Metro.
[(1)(a) The provisions of subsections (2) to (9) of this  section apply to metropolitan service district
regional framework plans and local government comprehensive plans for lands within the  urban
growth boundary of a city  that is located outside of a metropolitan service district and has a population
of 25,000 or more. ]
[(b) The Land Conservation and Development Commission may establish a set  of factors under
which additional cities are subject to the provisions of this section. In establishing the set of factors
required under this paragraph, the commission shall consider the size  of the city, the rate of population
growth of the city  or the proximity of the city to another city with a population of 25,000 or more or
to a metropolitan service district. ]
(2)(a) [ A local government ] Metro  shall demonstrate that its [ comprehensive plan or ] regional
framework plan provides  sufficient buildable lands within the urban growth boundary established
pursuant to statewide planning goals to accommodate estimated housing needs for 20 years:
(A) At periodic review under ORS 197.628 to 197.651;
(B) As scheduled by the Land Conservation and Development Commission[ :]
[(i) at least once each eight years for local governments that are not within  a metropolitan service
district; or ]
[(ii)] at least once each six years [ for a metropolitan service district ]; or
(C) At any other legislative review of the [ comprehensive plan or ] regional framework plan that
concerns the urban growth  boundary and requires the application of a statewide planning goal re-
lating to buildable lands for residential use.
(b) The 20-year period shall commence  on the date initially scheduled for completion of the re-
view under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) In performing the duties under subsection (2) of this section, [ a local government ] Metro
shall:
(a) Inventory the supply of buildable lands within the urban growth boundary and  determine the
housing capacity of the buildable lands; and
(b) Conduct an analysis of existing and projected  housing need by type and density range, in
accordance with all factors under ORS 197.303 and statewide planning goals  and rules relating to
housing, to determine the number of units and amount of land needed  for each needed housing type
for the next 20 years.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 17
(4)(a) For the  purpose of the inventory described in subsection (3)(a) of this section, “buildable
lands”  includes:
(A) Vacant lands planned or zoned for residential use;
(B) Partially vacant lands planned or zoned for residential use;
(C) Lands that may be used for a mix of residential and employment uses  under the existing
planning or zoning; and
(D) Lands that may be used for residential infill or redevelopment.
(b) For  the purpose of the inventory and determination of housing capacity described in sub-
section (3)(a) of this section, [ the local government ] Metro  must demonstrate consideration of:
(A) The extent that residential  development is prohibited or restricted by local regulation and
ordinance, state law and rule or federal statute and regulation;
(B) A written long term contract or easement for radio, telecommunications or  electrical facili-
ties, if the written contract or easement is provided to [ the local government; and ] Metro;
(C) The presence of a single family dwelling or other structure on a lot or parcel[ .]; and
(D) Factors that influence available housing supply, including short-term  rentals, second
homes and vacation homes.
(c) Except for land that may be used  for residential infill or redevelopment, [ a local
government] Metro  shall create a map or document that may be used to verify and  identify specific
lots or parcels that have been determined to be buildable lands.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and  (c) of this subsection, the determination of
housing capacity  pursuant to subsection (3)(a) of this section must be based on data relating to land
within the urban growth boundary that has been collected since the last review under subsection
(2)(a)(B) of this section. The data shall include:
(A) The number, density and average mix of housing  types of urban residential development that
have actually occurred;
(B) Trends in density and average mix of housing types of urban residential development;
(C) Market factors that may substantially impact future urban residential development; and
(D) The number, density and average mix of housing types that have  occurred on the buildable
lands described in subsection (4)(a) of this section.
(b) [ A local government ] Metro  shall make the  determination described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection using a shorter  time period than the time period described in paragraph (a) of this sub-
section if [ the local government ] Metro  finds that the shorter time period will  provide more accurate
and reliable data related to housing capacity. The shorter time  period may not be less than three
years.
(c) [ A local government ] Metro  shall use data from a wider  geographic area or use a time period
longer than the time period described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection if the analysis of a wider
geographic area or the use of a  longer time period will provide more accurate, complete and reliable
data relating to trends affecting  housing need than an analysis performed pursuant to paragraph (a)
of this subsection. [ The local government ] Metro  must clearly describe the geographic area, time
frame and source of data used in a determination performed under this paragraph.
(6) If the housing need determined pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this  section is greater than
the housing capacity determined pursuant  to subsection (3)(a) of this section, [ the local government ]
Metro shall take one or both of the following actions to accommodate the additional housing  need:
(a) Amend its urban  growth boundary to include sufficient buildable lands to accommodate
housing needs for the next 20 years. As part of this process, [ the local government ] Metro  shall
consider the effects of measures taken  pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection. The amendment
shall include  sufficient land reasonably necessary to accommodate the siting of new public school
facilities. The need and inclusion  of lands for new public school facilities shall be a coordinated
process between the affected public school districts and [ the local  government ] Metro  that has the
authority to approve the urban growth boundary.
(b) Amend its [ comprehensive plan, ] regional framework plan, functional plan or land use regu-
lations to include new measures that demonstrably increase  the likelihood that residential develop-
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 18
ment will occur at densities sufficient to accommodate housing needs for the next 20 years without
expansion of the urban growth boundary. [ A local government or metropolitan service district that ]
If Metro  takes this action , Metro  shall  adopt findings regarding the density expectations assumed
to result  from measures adopted under this paragraph based upon the factors listed in ORS 197.303
(2) and data  in subsection (5)(a) of this section. The density expectations may not project an increase
in residential capacity above achieved density by more than three percent without quantifiable val-
idation of such departures. [ For a  local government located outside of a metropolitan service district,
a quantifiable validation must  demonstrate that the assumed housing capacity has been achieved in
areas that are zoned to allow no greater than the same authorized density level within the local juris-
diction or a jurisdiction in the same  region. For a metropolitan service district, ] A quantifiable vali-
dation must demonstrate that the assumed housing capacity has been achieved in areas within
Metro that are zoned  to allow no greater than the same authorized density level , as defined in
ORS 227.175 [ within the metropolitan service district ].
[(c) As used in  this subsection, “authorized density level” has the meaning given that term in ORS
227.175.]
(7) Using the housing need analysis conducted under subsection (3)(b)  of this section, [ the local
government] Metro  shall determine the overall average density and overall mix of  housing types at
which residential development of needed housing types must occur in order to meet housing needs
over the next 20 years. If that density  is greater than the actual density of development determined
under subsection (5)(a)(A) of this section,  or if that mix is different from the actual mix of housing
types determined under subsection (5)(a)(A)  of this section, [ the local government ] Metro , as part of
its periodic review, shall adopt measures that  demonstrably increase the likelihood that residential
development will occur at the  housing types and density and at the mix of housing types required
to meet housing needs over the next 20 years.
(8)(a) [ A local government outside a  metropolitan service district that ] If Metro  takes any actions
under subsection (6) or (7) of this section , Metro shall demonstrate that the comprehensive plan and
land use regulations comply with goals and rules  adopted by the commission and implement ORS
197.286 to 197.314.
(b) [ A local government ] Metro  shall determine the density and mix of housing types anticipated
as a result of actions taken  under subsections (6) and (7) of this section and monitor and record the
actual density and mix of housing types achieved following the  adoption of these actions. [ The local
government] Metro  shall compare actual and anticipated  density and mix. [ The local government ]
Metro shall submit its comparison to the commission  at the next review of its urban growth
boundary under subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(9) In establishing that actions and measures adopted under subsections (6) and (7) of this sec-
tion demonstrably increase the likelihood of  higher density residential development, [ the local gov-
ernment] Metro  shall at a minimum ensure that land zoned for  needed housing is in locations
appropriate for the housing types identified under subsection (3) of this section, is  zoned at density
ranges that are likely to be achieved by the housing  market using the analysis in subsection (3) of
this section and is in areas where sufficient urban services are planned to enable the higher  density
development to occur over the 20-year period. Actions or measures, or both, may include [ but are
not limited to: ] those actions listed in ORS 197.290 (3).
[(a) Increases in the permitted density on existing residential land; ]
[(b) Financial incentives for higher density housing; ]
[(c) Provisions permitting additional density beyond that generally allowed in the  zoning district
in exchange for amenities and features provided by the developer; ]
[(d) Removal or easing of approval standards or procedures; ]
[(e) Minimum density ranges; ]
[(f) Redevelopment and infill strategies; ]
[(g) Authorization of housing types not previously allowed by the plan or regulations; ]
[(h) Adoption of an average residential density standard; and ]
[(i) Rezoning or redesignation of nonresidential land. ]
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 19
[(10)(a) The provisions of this subsection apply to local government comprehensive plans for lands
within the urban growth boundary of a city that is located outside of a  metropolitan service district
and has a population of less than 25,000. ]
[(b) As  required under paragraph (c) of this subsection, a city shall, according to rules of the
commission:]
[(A) Determine the estimated housing needs within the jurisdiction for the next 20 years; ]
[(B) Inventory the supply of buildable  lands available within the urban growth boundary to ac-
commodate the estimated housing needs determined under this subsection; and ]
[(C) Adopt measures necessary to accommodate the estimated housing  needs determined under this
subsection.]
[(c) The actions required under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be undertaken: ]
[(A) At periodic review pursuant to ORS 197.628 to 197.651; ]
[(B) On a schedule established by the commission for cities with a population greater than  10,000,
not to exceed once each eight years; or ]
[(C) At any other legislative review  of the comprehensive plan that requires the application of a
statewide planning goal relating to buildable lands for residential use. ]
[(d) For the purpose of the inventory described  in this subsection, “buildable lands” includes those
lands described in subsection (4)(a) of this section. ]
[(11) If a city with a population of 10,000 or less conducts an inventory of the supply  of buildable
lands or  an estimate of housing need, it must satisfy the requirements of subsection (10) of this
section.]
SECTION 26.  ORS 197.297 is amended to read:
197.297. (1) At least once every six years, by a date scheduled by the Land Conservation and
Development Commission, a city  that is within [ a metropolitan service district ] Metro  and has a
population of 10,000 or  greater [ than 10,000] shall:
(a) Inventory the supply of buildable lands within the city and determine the  housing capacity
of the buildable lands; and
(b) Conduct an analysis of the  city’s existing and projected needed housing under statewide
planning goals and rules related to  housing by type, mix, affordability and density range to deter-
mine the number of units and amount of land needed for each needed housing type under section
23 of this 2023 Act  for the next 20 years.
(2) The housing capacity determination and the needed housing analysis conducted under this
section must be adopted as part of the city’s comprehensive plan no later than  one year after com-
pletion of the needed housing analysis.
(3) If the housing capacity  and needed housing analysis conducted under this section demon-
strates a housing  need, the city shall amend its comprehensive plan or land use regulations or take
actions to update or implement its housing production strategy  to include new measures that
demonstrably increase the likelihood that development of needed housing will  occur for the type,
mix, affordability and densities sufficient to accommodate needed housing for the next 20 years.
SECTION 27.  ORS 197.303 is amended to read:
197.303. (1) As  used in ORS [ 197.286 to 197.314 ] 197.296 and this section , “needed housing”
means all housing on land zoned for residential use or mixed residential and commercial  use that
is determined  to meet the need shown for housing within an urban growth boundary at price ranges
and rent levels  that are affordable to households within the county with a variety of incomes, in-
cluding but not limited to households with low incomes, very low incomes and extremely low  in-
comes, as those terms are defined by  the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development under 42 U.S.C. 1437a. “Needed housing” includes the following housing types:
(a) Attached and detached single-family housing , middle housing types as  described in ORS
197.758 and multiple family housing for both owner and renter occupancy;
(b) Government assisted housing;
(c) Mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks as provided in ORS 197.475 to 197.490;
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 20
(d) Manufactured homes on individual lots planned and  zoned for single-family residential use
that are in addition to lots within designated manufactured dwelling subdivisions; [ and]
(e) Agriculture workforce  housing [ for farmworkers. ];
(f) Housing for individuals with  a variety of disabilities related to mobility or communi-
cations that require accessibility features;
(g) Housing for older persons, as defined in ORS 659A.421; and
(h) Housing for college or university students, if relevant to the region.
(2) For the purpose of estimating housing needs, as described in ORS 197.296 (3)(b), [ a local
government shall use the population projections prescribed by ORS 195.033 or 195.036 and shall  con-
sider and adopt findings related to changes in ] Metro shall adopt findings and perform  an anal-
ysis that estimates each of the following factors [ since the last review under  ORS 197.296 (2)(a)(B)
and the projected future changes in these factors over a 20-year planning period ]:
[(a) Household sizes; ]
[(b) Household demographics; ]
[(c) Household incomes; ]
[(d) Vacancy rates; and ]
[(e) Housing costs. ]
(a) Projected needed housing units over the next 20 years;
(b) Current housing underproduction;
(c) Housing units needed for people experiencing homelessness; and
(d) Housing units projected to be converted into vacation  homes or second homes during
the next 20 years.
(3) At the time  Metro performs the analysis under subsection (2) of this section, Metro
shall allocate a housing need for each city within Metro.
(4) In making an allocation under subsection (3) of this section, Metro shall consider:
(a) The forecasted population growth under ORS 195.033 or 195.036;
(b) The forecasted regional job growth;
(c) An equitable statewide distribution of housing for income levels  described in section
2 (4) of this 2023 Act.
(d) The estimates made under subsection (2) of this section; and
(e) The purpose of the Oregon Housing Needs Analysis under section  1 (1) of this 2023
Act.
[(3)] (5) [ A local  government ] Metro  shall make the estimate described in subsection (2) of this
section using a shorter time period than since the last review  under ORS 197.296 (2)(a)(B) if [ the
local government ] Metro  finds that the shorter  time period will provide more accurate and reliable
data related to housing need. The shorter time period may not be less than three years.
[(4)] (6)  [ A local government ] Metro  shall use  data from a wider geographic area or use a time
period longer than the time period  described in subsection (2) of this section if the analysis of a
wider geographic area or  the use of a longer time period will provide more accurate, complete and
reliable data relating to trends affecting housing  need than an analysis performed pursuant to sub-
section (2) of  this section. [ The local government ] Metro  must clearly describe the geographic area,
time frame and source of data used in an estimate performed under this subsection.
[(5)] (7) Subsection (1)(a) and (d) of this section does not apply to[ :]
[(a)] a city with a population of less than 2,500.
[(b) A county with a population of less than 15,000. ]
[(6)] (8) [ A local government ] Metro  may take an exception under ORS 197.732 to the  definition
of “needed housing” in subsection (1) of this section in  the same manner that an exception may be
taken under the goals.
HOUSING STRATEGIES
SECTION 28.
 ORS 197.290 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 21
197.290. (1) A city with a population of 10,000 or  greater [ than 10,000] shall develop and adopt
a housing production strategy under this section no later than the latter of the date:
(a) One  year after the city’s deadline for completing a housing capacity [ analysis] determi-
nation under ORS  [ 197.296 (2)(a) or (10)(b) or ] 197.297 (1) or section 21 (2) or 22 (2) of this 2023
Act;  or
(b) If the  city has adopted a housing production strategy previously, three years following
the most recent adoption of a strategy .
(2) A housing production strategy must include a list of specific actions, including the adoption
of measures and policies, that the city shall undertake to promote [ development within the city to
address a housing need identified under ORS 197.296 (6)(b) or (10)(b) or 197.297. ]:
(a) The development of needed housing;
(b) The development and maintenance of housing that is of diverse housing types,  high-
quality, affordable and accessible;
(c) Housing with access to economic opportunities, services and amenities; and
(d) Affirmatively furthering fair housing.
(3) Actions [ under this  subsection may ] that may be included in a housing production strat-
egy include:
(a) The reduction of financial  and regulatory impediments to developing needed housing, in-
cluding removing or  easing approval standards or procedures for needed housing at higher densities
or that is affordable;
(b) The creation of  financial and regulatory incentives for development of needed housing, in-
cluding creating incentives for needed housing at higher densities or that is affordable; [ and]
(c) The development of a plan to access resources  available at local, regional, state and national
levels to increase the availability and affordability of needed housing[ .];
(d) Target development on lands identified under section 13 (1) of this 2023 Act;
(e) Actions that affirmatively further fair housing;
(f) Actions that:
(A) Increase housing diversity, efficiency and affordability, including new construction
and the preservation of naturally occurring affordable housing;
(B) Allow greater housing choice for households and greater  flexibility in location, type
and density;
(C) Reduce cost or delay and increase procedural certainty for the  production of housing;
or
(D) Prepare land for development or redevelopment, including:
(i) Public facilities planning and other investment strategies that increase the readiness
of land for development for housing production;
(ii) Site preparation, financial incentives or other incentive-based measures that  increase
the likelihood of development or redevelopment of land; or
(iii) The redevelopment of underutilized commercial and employment lands for  housing
or a mix of housing and commercial uses; or
(g) Any other actions identified by rule of  the Land Conservation and Development
Commission intended to promote housing production, affordability and choice.
(4) Actions  proposed in a city’s housing production strategy shall include clear deadlines
by which the city expects to undertake the action.
[(3)] (5) In creating a housing production strategy, a city shall review and consider:
(a) Socioeconomic and demographic  characteristics of households living in existing needed
housing;
(b) Market conditions affecting the provision of needed housing;
(c) Measures already adopted by the city to promote the development of needed housing;
(d) Existing and expected barriers to the development of needed housing; and
(e) For each action the city includes in its housing production strategy:
(A) The schedule for its adoption;
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 22
(B) The schedule for its implementation;
(C) Its expected magnitude of impact on the development of needed housing; and
(D) The time frame over which it is expected to impact needed housing.
[(4)] (6) The housing production strategy must include  within its index a copy of the city’s most
recently completed survey under [ ORS 456.586 (2) ] section 37 of this 2023 Act .
[(5)] (7)  The adoption of a housing production strategy is not a land use decision and is not
subject to appeal or review except as provided in ORS 197.291.
[(6)] (8) A city with  a population of less than  10,000 [or less ] may develop a housing production
strategy as provided in this section.
(9) As used in this section, “affirmatively furthering fair  housing” means meaningful
actions that, when taken together, address  significant disparities in housing needs and ac-
cess to opportunity and replace segregated living patterns  with truly integrated and balanced
living patterns to transform racially and ethnically concentrated areas of poverty  into areas
of opportunity and foster and maintain compliance with civil rights and fair housing laws.
SECTION 29.
Section 30 of this 2023 Act is added to  and made a part of ORS 197.286 to
197.314.
SECTION 30. (1) Metro shall develop and adopt  a housing coordination strategy under
this section no later  than one year after the deadline for completing a housing capacity de-
termination under ORS 197.296.
(2) Regional governments other than Metro,  including counties or intergovernmental
entities described under ORS 190.003 to 190.130, may adopt a housing coordination strategy
as provided in this section.
(3) A housing coordination strategy must include a  list of actions, including the adoption
of measures and policies or coordinating actions among local governments and other  entities
within a region, that the regional entity shall undertake to promote:
(a) The development of needed housing;
(b) The  development and maintenance of housing that is of diverse housing types, high-
quality, physically accessible and affordable;
(c) Housing with access to economic opportunities, services and amenities; and
(d) Development patterns  that replace segregated housing patterns with racially inte-
grated housing and that transform racially and ethnically concentrated areas of poverty into
areas of opportunity in compliance with fair housing laws.
(4) Actions constituting a housing coordination strategy may include:
(a) The identification or coordination of resources that support the  production of needed
housing, including funding, staff capacity or technical support at the regional or state level;
(b) The  identification of local or regional impediments to developing needed housing, in-
cluding financial, regulatory or capacity-related constraints;
(c) Regional strategies that coordinate production  of needed housing between local gov-
ernments within a region and that are  developed in consultation with impacted local gov-
ernments;
(d) The identification  of specific actions that cities in the region may consider as part
of a housing production strategy under ORS 197.290; and
(e) Any other actions identified by rule  of the Land Conservation and Development
Commission that may promote the quantity or quality of developed housing in the region.
(5) A housing coordination strategy does not include changes to  the amount of buildable
lands under ORS 197.296.
(6) In creating a  housing coordination strategy, a regional government shall review and
consider:
(a) Socioeconomic and demographic  characteristics of households living in existing
needed housing;
(b) Market conditions affecting the provision of needed housing;
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 23
(c) Measures already implemented by the regional entity to  promote the development of
needed housing;
(d) Existing and expected barriers to the planning or development of needed housing;  and
(e) For each action the regional entity includes in its housing coordination strategy:
(A) The schedule for its adoption, if applicable;
(B) The schedule for its implementation, if applicable;
(C) Its expected magnitude of impact on the development of needed housing; and
(D) The time frame over which it is expected to impact needed housing.
(7) The adoption of a housing  coordination strategy is not a land use decision and is not
subject to appeal or review except as provided in ORS 197.291.
SECTION 31.
 ORS 197.291 is amended to read:
197.291. (1) No later than 20 days after a city’s adoption or  amendment of a housing production
strategy under ORS 197.290, a city  shall submit the adopted strategy or amended strategy to the
Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(2) The submission under subsection (1) of this section must include copies of:
(a) The signed decision adopting the housing production strategy or amended strategy;
(b) The text of the housing production strategy clearly indicating any  amendments to the most
recent strategy submitted under this section;  and
(c) A brief narrative summary of the housing production strategy .[; and ]
[(d) The information reviewed and considered under ORS 197.293 (2). ]
(3) On the same day the city submits notice of the housing production strategy or amended
strategy, the city shall provide a notice to persons that participated  in the proceedings that led to
the adoption of the strategy and requested notice in writing.
(4) Within 10 days of  receipt of the submission under subsection (1) of this section, the depart-
ment shall provide notice to persons described under ORS 197.615 (3).
(5) The notices given under subsections (3) and (4) of this section must state:
(a) How and where materials described in subsection (2) of this section may be freely obtained;
(b) That comments on  the strategy may be submitted to the department within 45 days after the
department has received the submission; and
(c) That there is no further right of appeal.
(6) Based upon  criteria adopted by the Land Conservation and Development Commission[ , in-
cluding any criteria adopted under ORS 197.293 (2), ] the department shall, within 120 days after re-
ceiving the submission under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Approve the housing production strategy;
(b) Approve the housing  production strategy, subject to further review and actions [ under ORS
197.293 (2)]; or
(c) Remand the housing production strategy for further modification as  identified by the de-
partment.
(7) A determination by the  department under subsection (6) of this section is not a land use
decision and is final and not subject to appeal.
(8) The Land Conservation and Development Commission  may adopt rules describing
circumstances in which a city’s amendment to a comprehensive plan or adoption of a land
use regulation is not subject to review, including under ORS 197.610 to 197.625,  for compli-
ance with a statewide land  use planning goal related to transportation or economic develop-
ment if the amendment or adoption is included within a  housing production strategy that
has been approved under subsection (6) of this section.
URBAN AND RURAL RESERVES
SECTION 32.
 ORS 195.141 is amended to read:
195.141. (1) A  county and a [ metropolitan service district established under ORS chapter 268 ] city
or a county and  Metro  may enter into an intergovernmental agreement pursuant to ORS 190.003
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 24
to 190.130, 195.025 or 197.652 to 197.658  to designate rural reserves pursuant to this section [ and]
at the same time as designating urban reserves pursuant to ORS 195.145 (1)[ (b)].
(2) Land designated as a rural reserve:
(a) Must be outside an urban growth boundary.
(b) May not be designated as an urban reserve during the urban reserve planning period  de-
scribed in ORS 195.145 (4).
(c) May not be included within an urban growth boundary during the period of time  described
in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(3) When designating a rural  reserve under this section to provide long-term protection to the
agricultural  industry,  [ a county and a metropolitan service district shall base the designation ] the
designation must be based  on consideration  of factors including, but not limited to, whether land
proposed for designation as a rural reserve:
(a) Is situated in an area that is otherwise  potentially subject to urbanization during the period
described in subsection (2)(b) of this section,  as indicated by proximity to the urban growth bound-
ary and to properties with fair market values that significantly exceed agricultural values;
(b) Is capable of sustaining long-term agricultural operations;
(c) Has suitable soils and available water where needed to sustain long-term  agricultural oper-
ations; and
(d) Is suitable to sustain long-term agricultural operations, taking into account:
(A) The existence of a large block of agricultural or other resource land with  a concentration
or cluster of farms;
(B) The adjacent land  use pattern, including its location in relation to adjacent nonfarm uses
and the existence of buffers between agricultural operations and nonfarm uses;
(C) The agricultural land  use pattern, including parcelization, tenure and ownership patterns;
and
(D) The sufficiency of agricultural infrastructure in the area.
(4) Designation and protection of rural reserves pursuant  to this section or urban re-
serves pursuant to ORS 195.145 (1):
(a) Is not a basis for a claim for compensation under ORS 195.305 unless  the designation
and protection of rural reserves or urban reserves imposes a new restriction  on the use of
private real property.
(b) Does not impair the rights and immunities provided under ORS 30.930 to 30.947.
[(4)] (5) The Land Conservation and Development Commission shall[ , after consultation ] consult
with the  State Department of Agriculture[ , adopt by goal or by rule a process and criteria for desig-
nating rural reserves pursuant to this  section ] in adopting, amending or repealing rules under this
section.
SECTION 33.
 ORS 195.145 is amended to read:
195.145. (1) To ensure that the supply of land available for urbanization is maintained:
(a) Local governments may cooperatively designate lands  outside urban growth boundaries as
urban reserves subject to ORS 197.610 to 197.625 and 197.626.
(b) Alternatively, [ a metropolitan service district established under ORS chapter 268 ] Metro  and
a county  may enter into a written agreement pursuant to ORS 190.003 to 190.130, 195.025 or 197.652
to 197.658 to designate urban  reserves. A process and criteria developed pursuant to this paragraph
are an alternative to a process or criteria adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2)[(a)] The Land Conservation  and Development Commission may require a local government
to designate [ an urban reserve ] urban reserves  pursuant  to subsection (1)(a) of this section during
its periodic review in accordance with the conditions for periodic review under ORS 197.628.
[(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the commission may require a  local govern-
ment to designate an urban reserve pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of  this section outside of its periodic
review if: ]
[(A) The local government is  located inside a Primary Metropolitan Statistical Area or a Metro-
politan Statistical Area as designated by the Federal Census Bureau upon November 4, 1993; and ]
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 25
[(B) The local government has been required to designate an urban reserve by rule prior to  No-
vember 4, 1993. ]
(3) In carrying out subsections (1) and (2) of this section:
(a) Within an urban reserve, [ neither the  commission nor any ] a  local government [ shall] may
not prohibit the siting on a legal parcel of  a single family dwelling that would otherwise have been
allowed under law existing prior to designation as an urban reserve.
(b) The commission shall provide to local governments a list of options,  rather than prescribing
a single planning  technique, to ensure the efficient transition from rural to urban use in urban re-
serves.
(4) Urban reserves designated  [ by a metropolitan service district and a county pursuant to sub-
section (1)(b) of ] under this section must be planned to accommodate population and  employment
growth for:
(a) At least 40 years and not more than 50 years; or
(b) At least 20 years, and not more than 30  years, after the 20-year period for which the [ district
has demonstrated a buildable land supply in the most recent  inventory, determination and analysis
performed] local government has inventoried buildable lands  under ORS  197.296 or section 21
or 22 of this 2023 Act .
(5) Urban reserves may be established  at any time without regard to a schedule under
ORS 197.296 (2) or section 21 (2) or 22 (2) of this 2023 Act.
[(5)] (6) [ A district and a county shall base ] The designation of urban reserves under  [subsection
(1)(b) of ] this section must be based upon consideration of factors  including, but not limited to,
whether land proposed for designation as  urban reserves, alone or in conjunction with land inside
the urban growth boundary:
(a) Can be developed at urban densities  in a way that makes efficient use of existing and future
public infrastructure investments;
(b) Includes sufficient development capacity to support a healthy urban economy;
(c) Can be served by public schools and other urban-level public facilities and services efficiently
and cost-effectively by appropriate and financially capable service providers;
(d) Can be designed to be walkable  and served by a well-connected system of streets by appro-
priate service providers;
(e) Can be designed to preserve and enhance natural ecological systems; and
(f) Includes sufficient land suitable for a range of housing types.
[(6)] (7)  A county may take an exception under ORS 197.732 to  a statewide land use planning
goal to allow  the establishment of a transportation facility in an area designated as urban reserve
under [ subsection (1)(b) of ] this section.
[(7)] (8)  The  commission shall adopt by goal or by rule a process and criteria for designating
urban reserves pursuant to [ subsection (1)(b) of ] this section.
SECTION 34.
The amendments to ORS 195.141 and 195.145 by sections 32 and 33 of this
2023 Act do not apply to urban reserves or rural reserves that were adopted  on or before
June 30, 2023.
LOCAL HOUSING REPORTS
SECTION 35.  ORS 456.586 is amended to read:
456.586. [(1) For purposes of this section: ]
[(a) a household is severely rent burdened if the household spends more than 50 percent of the  in-
come of the household on gross rent for housing. ]
[(b) A regulated affordable unit is a residential unit subject to a regulatory  agreement that runs
with the land and that requires affordability for an  established income level for a defined period of
time.]
[(2)(a) The Housing and Community Services Department shall annually provide  to the governing
body of each city in this  state with a population greater than 10,000 the most current data available
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 26
from the United  States Census Bureau, or any other source the department considers at least as reli-
able, showing the percentage of renter households in the city that are severely rent burdened. ]
[(b) The Department of Land Conservation and Development, in consultation with the Housing and
Community Services Department, shall develop a survey form on which the governing body of  a city
may provide specific information  related to the affordability of housing within the city, including the
actions relating to land use and other related matters that  the city has taken to encourage the devel-
opment of needed housing, increase the affordability of  housing and reduce rent burdens for severely
rent burdened households. ]
[(c) The Department of Land Conservation and Development shall provide the  governing body of
the city with the survey form developed pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection. ]
[(d) The governing body of the city shall return the completed survey form to the Department of
Land Conservation and  Development at least 24 months prior to a deadline for completing a housing
production strategy under ORS 197.290. ]
[(3)(a)] In any year in which [ the governing body of  a city is informed under this section that at ]
a housing indicator demonstrates that least 25 percent of the renter households in [ the] a city
are severely rent burdened  under section 5 (2)(g) of this 2023 Act , the governing body of the city
shall hold at least one public meeting  to discuss the causes and consequences of severe rent burdens
within the city, the barriers to reducing rent burdens and possible solutions.
[(b)] The Housing and  Community Services Department may adopt rules governing the conduct
of the public meeting [ required under this subsection ].
[(4) No  later than February 1 of each year, the governing body of each city in this state with a
population greater than 10,000 shall submit to the Department of Land Conservation and  Development
a report for the immediately preceding calendar year setting forth  separately for each of the following
categories the total number of units that were permitted and the total number that were produced: ]
[(a) Residential units. ]
[(b) Regulated affordable residential units. ]
[(c) Multifamily residential units. ]
[(d) Regulated affordable multifamily residential units. ]
[(e) Single-family homes. ]
[(f) Regulated affordable single-family homes. ]
[(g) Accessory dwelling units. ]
[(h) Regulated affordable accessory dwelling units. ]
[(i) Units of middle housing, as defined in ORS 197.758. ]
[(j) Regulated affordable units of middle housing. ]
SECTION 36. Sections 37 and 38 of this 2023 Act are added to and made a part of  ORS
197.286 to 197.314.
SECTION 37. (1) No later than February 1 of each year, each city with a population  of
10,000 or greater shall submit to the Department of Land Conservation  and Development a
report for the immediately preceding calendar year setting forth:
(a) The number of residential units permitted and the number produced, segmented by:
(A) Single-family homes.
(B) Accessory dwelling units.
(C) Units of middle housing.
(D) Multifamily residential units, not including middle housing.
(E) Units with accessibility features or of an accessibility category  as recognized by a
building code established under ORS chapter 455.
(b) For each segment under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the number of units that
were subject to  a recorded agreement that runs with the land and that requires affordability
for an established income level for a defined period, but  that would not be included in the
inventory of publicly supported housing described in section 4 (3)(a) of this 2023 Act.
(2) The Department of  Land Conservation and Development, in consultation with the
Housing and Community Services Department, shall develop a format  by which data required
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 27
under this section must be submitted. The Department of Land Conservation and Develop-
ment shall provide a copy of any form or notice of the format to each  city required to pro-
vide a report.
(3) The Department  of Land Conservation and Development shall provide a copy of the
data received under this section to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and
the Housing and Community Services Department by July 1 of each year.
SECTION 38.
Between 12 and 18 months before a city’s deadline for completing  a housing
capacity determination under ORS 197.297 (1) or section 21 (2) or 22 (2) of this 2023 Act, each
city with a population of 10,000 or  greater shall submit to the Department of Land Conser-
vation and Development a report setting forth the actions that a  city has taken since its
most recent housing capacity determination to implement  its housing production strategy
or to otherwise encourage the  development of needed housing, to increase the affordability
of housing, to reduce rent burdens, to affirmatively further fair housing  or to otherwise
meet the purposes of ORS 197.290 (2).
SECTION 39. ORS 197.178 is repealed.
POPULATION FORECASTS
SECTION 40.  ORS 195.033 is amended to read:
195.033. (1) As used in this section, “affected local government” means:
(a) A  city or county for which the Portland State University Population Research Center is
preparing a population forecast;
(b) A county that contains  all or part of a city or an urban growth boundary for which the
center is preparing a population forecast; and
(c) A local service district, as defined in ORS 174.116, that includes territory  within the area
subject to the population forecast.
(2) For the purpose of land use planning, the center shall issue a population forecast for:
(a) Each county except Multnomah, Clackamas and Washington Counties;
(b) The portions of Multnomah,  Clackamas and Washington Counties that are not within Metro;
and
(c) The area within each urban growth boundary other than the  urban growth boundary of
Metro.
(3) A local government with land use jurisdiction over land for which the center issues popu-
lation forecasts under subsection (2) of this section  shall apply the current final population forecast
when changing the comprehensive plan or a land use regulation of the local government.
(4) The center shall issue population forecasts for each area described in  subsection (2) of this
section not less than  once every four years on a schedule established by standards adopted by
Portland State  University in consultation with the Department of Land Conservation and Develop-
ment.
(5) When issuing a population forecast, the center shall:
(a) Consider and, if appropriate, incorporate available local data and  information about local
conditions received from representatives of local governments and members of the public;
(b) Cause, directly or with the assistance of the Department of Land  Conservation and Devel-
opment, the issuance of notice to  all affected local governments and to members of the public that
have provided a written request for notice to the center; and
(c) Post the methodology and supporting  data used to make the population forecast on a publicly
available website when the center  causes notice to be issued as described in paragraph (b) of this
subsection.
(6) A population forecast must forecast population for a 50-year period including:
(a) Forecasts for intervals, within the 50-year period, that are established by standards  adopted
by Portland State University in consultation with the Department of Land Conservation and Devel-
opment; [ and]
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 28
(b) Population cohorts as provided by standards adopted by the  university in consultation with
the department[ .];
(c) Population data segmented by race, ethnicity and disability status; and
(d) Segregated information for populations on tribal lands.
(7) Within 45 days after the  center issues a proposed population forecast under this section, a
member of the public or an affected local government may file objections with the center. An ob-
jection must be supported by the inclusion of  data or information that supports the objection. If the
center:
(a) Does not receive an objection within the 45-day period, the proposed  population forecast
becomes final.
(b) Receives an objection within the  45-day period, the center shall review the objections filed,
make changes to the proposed population forecast,  if necessary in the discretion of the center, and
issue a final population forecast.
(8) Periodically, the Department of Land Conservation  and Development may require the center
to submit its forecasting methodology and local data collection practices for review  by an advisory
committee established by the department and composed of experts in  the field of population fore-
casting, representatives of cities and counties and members of the public.
(9) The issuance of a final population forecast under this section is:
(a) Not a land use decision; and
(b) A final decision not subject to further review or appeal.
(10) The Land Conservation and Development Commission, in consultation with  Portland State
University, shall adopt rules to implement  the population forecasting program required by this sec-
tion.
(11) Each biennium, the commission [ shall] may  allocate,  from the grant funding described in
ORS 197.639 (5), an amount of  moneys that the Land Conservation and Development Commission, in
consultation with Portland State  University, determines is sufficient , in combination with any
appropriation by the Legislative Assembly,  to  operate the population forecasting program re-
quired by this section.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 195.036 is amended to read:
195.036. Metro, in coordination with local governments  within its boundary, shall issue a popu-
lation forecast for the entire area within its boundary  to be applied by Metro and local governments
within the boundary of Metro as a basis for changes to comprehensive plans and  land use regu-
lations. The forecasted population data must  be segmented by race, ethnicity and disability
status.
YOUTH HOMELESSNESS
SECTION 42.  ORS 458.650 is amended to read:
458.650. (1) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall administer the Emergency
Housing Account to assist homeless  individuals and individuals who are at risk of becoming
homeless, through  means including the emergency housing assistance program and the state
homeless assistance program.  Notwithstanding subsection (3)(a) of this section, the state homeless
assistance program shall serve individuals experiencing homelessness, especially  unsheltered
homelessness, without respect to income.
(2) The  Oregon Housing Stability Council shall develop a policy for the use of program funds
with the advice of:
(a) Persons who have experienced housing instability;
(b) Tribes;
(c) The Community Action Partnership of Oregon;
(d) Continuums of care, as defined in 24 C.F.R. part 578;
(e) Local governments;
(f) Nonprofit organizations;
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 29
(g) Homeless services providers;
(h) Culturally specific organizations;
(i) Housing providers;
(j) Veterans’ services organizations; and
(k) Other entities identified by the department by rule.
(3) The policy under subsection (2) of this section  shall direct that program funds shall be used:
(a) To provide to low and very low income individuals, including but  not limited to individuals
more than 65 years of age, persons with disabilities, agricultural workers and Native Americans:
(A) Emergency shelters and attendant services;
(B) Transitional housing services designed to assist individuals to make the  transition from
homelessness to permanent housing and economic independence;
(C) Supportive  housing services to enable individuals to continue living in their own homes or
to provide in-home services for such individuals for whom suitable programs do not exist in  their
geographic area;
(D) Programs that provide emergency payment of home payments, rents or utilities; or
(E) Some or all of the [ needs] services or assistance  described in  subparagraphs (A) to (D) of
this paragraph.
(b) To provide the services  and assistance described in paragraph (a) of this subsection
to school-aged  children enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12, or to their families, who
are homeless or at risk of becoming homeless.
[(b)] (c)  To align with federal  strategies and resources that are available to prevent and end
homelessness, including the requirement of providing culturally responsive services  and using
evidence-based and emerging practices  effective in ending homelessness, including practices unique
to rural communities.
(4)(a) The council shall require as a condition of awarding a grant  that the organization dem-
onstrate to the satisfaction of the council that the organization:
(A) Has the capacity to deliver any service proposed by the organization;
(B) Is a culturally  responsive organization or is engaged in a process to become a culturally
responsive organization;
(C) Engages with culturally specific organizations; and
(D) Supports local homelessness system planning efforts.
(b) Any funds granted under this section may not be used to replace existing funds. Funds
granted under this section may be used to supplement  existing funds. An organization may use funds
to support existing programs or to establish new programs.
(5) The department may expend funds from the account for:
(a) The administration of the account as provided for in the  legislatively approved budget, as
that term is defined in ORS 291.002, for the department in  support of directing a statewide policy
on homelessness that ensures use of evidence-based  and emerging practices, service equity in fund-
ing and local planning processes.
(b) The development of technical assistance and training resources  for organizations developing
and operating emergency shelters as defined in ORS 197.782 and transitional housing  accommo-
dations as described in ORS 197.746.
(6) The department shall utilize outcome-oriented contracting processes and  evidence-based and
emerging practices for account  program funds, including evidence-based and emerging practices for
serving rural communities.
(7) Twenty-five percent of  moneys deposited in the account pursuant to ORS 294.187 are dedi-
cated to the emergency housing assistance program for assistance to veterans who are homeless  or
at risk of becoming homeless.
SECTION 43.
 Section 1, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by  section 1, chapter 42,
Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 30
Sec. 1.  (1) As used in  this section, [ “unaccompanied homeless youth” ] “youth experiencing
homelessness”  means a person who is  at least 14 years of age but not more than 24 years of age,
who is not in the physical custody of a parent or legal guardian and who is homeless.
(2) In addition  to any other scholarships or grants, the Department of Human Services may
award two-year grants to organizations that  provide services to [ unaccompanied homeless ] youth
experiencing homelessness.
(3) The department may award a grant under this section to an organization that:
(a) Has an existing grant from the department to provide services  to [ unaccompanied homeless ]
youth experiencing homelessness ; or
[(b) Has an existing contract with the  department to provide services to unaccompanied homeless
youth and the department has determined that the organization is capable of expanding  to provide
services in additional communities; ]
[(c) Is a nonprofit organization or a coalition  of nonprofit organizations that the department has
determined is capable of meeting the grant program requirements; or ]
[(d) Is a new entity that the department determines is  capable of meeting the grant program re-
quirements.]
(b) Proposes to provide evidence-based services, as described by  the department by rule,
for youth experiencing homelessness in an underserved area or an area in  which those ser-
vices are not provided.
(4) Grants awarded under this section may be used for any of the following:
(a) To increase the accessibility of any of the following programs and services to [ unaccompanied
homeless] youth  experiencing homelessness :
(A) Shelter facilities;
(B) Outreach;
(C) Culturally specific services; and
(D) Mental health or substance abuse services; and
(b) To create or strengthen partnerships  with host home programs and other transitional hous-
ing options.
(5) An  applicant for a grant under this section must describe how the applicant intends
to ensure that other funding, including from federal or local governments or  charitable do-
nations, will be used to supplement the total cost of the proposed program.
[(5)] (6)  The department may adopt rules to administer the  grant program described in this
section.
SECTION 44.
 Section 2, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Host home project” means a project that facilitates an arrangement under which  [ an unac-
companied homeless ] a youth  experiencing homelessness  resides in the home of  a private individ-
ual, pursuant to the terms of a contract  between the private individual and the youth, for free or
at below-market rent.
(b) “Long-term host home project” means a host home project run by an organization that  has
a memorandum of  understanding or a letter of agreement with one or more school districts and in
which [ unaccompanied homeless ] participating youth experiencing homelessness [ participants], on
average during the most recent two years, resided in host homes for a minimum of 180  days, as re-
ported by the relevant school district.
(c) “Short-term host home project” means a host home project in which [unaccompanied
homeless] participating youth  experiencing homelessness  [ participants], on  average during the
most recent two  years, resided in host homes for a maximum of 180 days, as reported by the relevant
school district.
(d) [ “Unaccompanied homeless youth” ] “Youth experiencing homelessness”  means a person
who is:
(A) At least 16 years of age but not more than 21 years of age;
(B) Not in the physical custody of a parent or legal guardian;
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 31
(C) Not in the custody of the Department of Human Services;
(D) Not a ward of the state; and
(E) Homeless.
(2) In addition to and not in lieu of any other scholarships or grants, the  department may award
two-year grants  to organizations that operate host home projects for [ unaccompanied homeless] youth
experiencing homelessness.
(3) An organization is eligible to apply for a grant under this section if  the organization [ oper-
ated a host home project on January 1, 2021, and ] can demonstrate the ability to:
(a) Continue the operation of existing host home projects;
[(a)] (b) Expand host home projects in  communities in which the organization provides services;
[(b)] (c)  Establish new long-term host home projects in communities that do  not have long-term
host home projects; or
[(c)] (d) Establish new short-term host home projects.
(4) Recipients of  grants awarded under this section shall work to achieve the following outcomes
for [ unaccompanied homeless ] youth  experiencing homelessness :
(a) Improved school attendance.
(b) Participation in formal or informal mentoring.
(c) Increased access to nutrition, health care, mental trauma-informed support and transporta-
tion services.
(5) A recipient of a grant awarded under this section shall ensure all individuals of 18 years  of
age or older residing in the host home  who are not the [ unaccompanied homeless ] youth  experi-
encing homelessness  have an approved background check under ORS 181A.200 and 409.027.
(6) A host home is not a child-caring agency as defined in ORS 418.205.
(7) The department may adopt rules to administer the grant program described in this section.
SECTION 45.
 Section 6, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  [ (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2021 Act are repealed on June 30, 2023. ]
[(2)] Sections 3 and 5 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2021,  are repealed on Jan-
uary 2, 2024.
MODULAR HOUSING FUNDING
SECTION 46. Section 47 of  this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 458.
SECTION 47. (1) The Housing and Community Services  Department shall provide grants
or loans to entities to begin or expand production  capacity for the development of modular
housing and  components to support home builders and developers in meeting housing de-
mand.
(2) The department  shall establish a temporary advisory committee under ORS 285A.060
to advise the department on providing grants or loans under this section.
(3) The department shall establish the terms for any loans under this section.
(4) Entities receiving loans or grants under this section must  agree to terms established
by the department requiring that the entities prioritize  supplying modular housing compo-
nents to meet demand from:
(a) First, state and local governments following a wildfire or other disaster;
(b) Second, low income housing construction in this state; and
(c) Third, middle income housing construction in this state.
(5) The department may enter into a contract with a third party to award or administer
grants under this section.
(6) Loan proceeds and other moneys recovered under  this section shall be paid to the
Housing and Community  Services Department and deposited with the State Treasury for
credit to the General Fund and are available for general governmental expenses.
SECTION 48.
Section 47 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 32
SECTION 49. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  beginning
July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $20,000,000, to make loans or  grants
under section 47 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 49a. In addition to and not in  lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium beginning
July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $248,366, to administer grants and loans
made under section 47 of this 2023 Act.
MODERATE INCOME HOUSING PREDEVELOPMENT LOANS
SECTION 50. Section 51 of  this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 289.
SECTION 51. (1) The Oregon Facilities  Authority shall provide financing, including refi-
nancing, to local  governments or housing developers for predevelopment costs, including
infrastructure, site acquisition, planning, reports, surveys and consultants.
(2) Financing under this section is available only for housing projects that will be subject
to an affordability restriction, including an affordable  housing covenant under ORS 456.270
to 456.295, that:
(a) Has a term of no less than 25 years; and
(b) Requires that each dwelling unit be rented as the  primary residence for a moderate
income household as defined in ORS 456.270.
(3) The financing provided by the authority under this section:
(a) May not exceed $500,000 per eligible project;
(b) Must charge interest of three percent or lower;
(c) May only be used for a project with a total cost of less than  $40,000,000 or that con-
sists of 80 or fewer residential units; and
(d) May not exceed 75 percent of the project’s total predevelopment costs unless the
project will be restricted to households with incomes equal to or less than the area  median
income.
(4) Notwithstanding the definitions of “housing institution” and “project” under  ORS
289.005, the activity of the authority under this section is an eligible project,  as that term is
used in this chapter.
SECTION 52.
Section 51 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 53. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Oregon Facilities Authority,  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $3,613,925, for deposit into the Oregon Facilities Authority  Ac-
count to be used for the purposes of section 51 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 53a. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$3,613,925 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by  the Oregon Facilities Authority from the Oregon Facilities Authority
Account, created under ORS 289.130, for the purposes of section 51 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 53b. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$263,925 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the State Treasurer,
for the purpose of oversight  and administration of financing by the Oregon Facilities Au-
thority under section 51 of this 2023 Act.
TERMINATION OF RESIDENTIAL TENANCY FOR NONPAYMENT
SECTION 54. Section 55 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 90.
SECTION 55. (1) As used in this section:
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 33
(a) “Nonpayment” means  the nonpayment of a payment that is due to a landlord, in-
cluding a payment of rent, late charges, utility or service charges or any other charge or  fee
as described in the rental agreement or ORS 90.140,  90.302, 90.315, 90.392, 90.394, 90.560 to
90.584 or 90.630.
(b) “Nonpayment” does  not include payments owed by a tenant for damages to the
premises.
(2) A  landlord shall deliver a copy of the notice posted on the website of the Judicial
Department under section 56 of this 2023 Act along with:
(a) Any notice of termination for nonpayment; and
(b) Any summons for a complaint  seeking possession based on nonpayment given by the
landlord or service processor, including a summons delivered under ORS 105.135 (3)(b).
(3) A court shall enter a  judgment dismissing a complaint for possession that is based
on a termination notice for nonpayment if the court determines that:
(a) The landlord failed to deliver the notice as required under  subsection (2) of this sec-
tion;
(b) The landlord  caused the tenant to not tender rent, including as a result of the
landlord’s failure to reasonably participate with a rental assistance program; or
(c) The tenant has tendered or caused to be tendered rental assistance  or any other
payment covering the nonpayment  amount owed under the termination notice for nonpay-
ment.
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 105.137  (4), if a claim for possession is dismissed under sub-
section (3)(c) of this section and the payment was tendered after the action was commenced,
the tenant is not entitled to prevailing party fees, costs or attorney fees.
(5) Notwithstanding 90.302, a landlord may charge a tenant for filing fees paid under ORS
105.130, if the complaint for possession is dismissed under subsection (3)(c) of  this section.
Payment of the fees is not a prerequisite  for dismissal under subsection (3)(c) of this section.
SECTION 56.
(1) The Judicial  Department, in consultation with the Housing and Com-
munity Services Department, shall supply and may  regularly update the notice required un-
der ORS 105.135 (2)(d) and section  55 (2) of this 2023 Act. The notice must be in substantially
the following form:
THIS IS AN IMPORTANT NOTICE OF WHERE TO GET HELP IF YOU ARE FACING
POTENTIAL EVICTION FOR NONPAYMENT.
For information in Spanish, Korean, Russian, Vietnamese or Chinese, go to the Judicial
Department website at .
You must comply with deadlines  identified in a notice of nonpayment, or you risk losing
your housing.
Rental assistance and support services may be  available. Dial 2-1-1 or go to
www.211info.org or contact a local service provider at .
Low-income tenants may be able  to receive free or low-cost legal advice by contacting a
legal aid organization. Go to to find an office near you.
The Oregon State Bar provides information about legal  assistance programs at
.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 34
(2) The Judicial Department shall translate the completed form under subsection (1) of
this section into the Spanish, Korean, Russian, Vietnamese and Chinese languages and  shall
display links to the English and translated forms prominently on the department’s website.
(3) Each  form on the Judicial Department website under subsection (2) of this section
must include a statement in English, Spanish, Korean, Russian, Vietnamese and Chinese  in-
dicating that the form and translations can be found on the Judicial  Department website and
providing the web address where the forms may be found.
SECTION 57. In distributing rental assistance to residential tenants funded  by federal,
state or local moneys, a public body, as defined in ORS 174.109, and any  designee or grantee
of a public body shall:
(1) Promptly provide  a dated application receipt to each tenant who applies for assist-
ance. The receipt may be in an electronic format.
(2) Close an application, after  providing notice of potential closure to the tenant, if the
provider reasonably determines that the tenant is no longer participating.
(3) If,  upon qualifying circumstance, an application is approved and payment is made to
a person other than the tenant’s landlord, provide a dated notice  of payment to the tenant’s
landlord at any known address or electronic mail address.
(4) If an application is denied or is otherwise closed without payment, provide a  dated
notice of the  denial or closure to the tenant and to the tenant’s landlord at any known ad-
dress or electronic mail address.
SECTION 58.  ORS 90.394 is amended to read:
90.394. The landlord may terminate the  rental agreement for nonpayment of rent and take pos-
session as provided in ORS 105.105 to 105.168, as follows:
(1) When the tenancy is a week-to-week tenancy, by delivering to the  tenant at least 72 hours’
written notice of nonpayment and  the landlord’s intention to terminate the rental agreement if the
rent is  not paid within that period. The landlord shall give this notice no sooner than on the fifth
day of the rental period, including the first day the rent is due.
(2) For all tenancies other than week-to-week tenancies, by delivering to the tenant:
(a) At least [ 72 hours’ ] 10 days’ written notice of nonpayment and the landlord’s  intention to
terminate the rental  agreement if the rent is not paid within that period. The landlord shall give this
notice no sooner than on  the eighth day of the rental period, including the first day the rent is due;
or
(b) At  least [ 144 hours’ ] 13 days’ written notice of nonpayment and the landlord’s intention to
terminate the rental  agreement if the rent is not paid within that period. The landlord shall give this
notice no sooner than on the fifth day of the rental period, including the first day the rent is due.
(3) The notice described in this section must also specify the  amount of rent that must be paid
and the date and time by which the tenant must pay the rent to cure the nonpayment of rent.
(4) Payment by a tenant who has received a notice under this section is timely if mailed to the
landlord within the period of the notice unless:
(a) The notice is served on the tenant:
(A) By personal delivery as provided in ORS 90.155 (1)(a); or
(B) By first class mail and attachment as provided in ORS 90.155 (1)(c);
(b) A written rental agreement and the notice expressly state that payment is  to be made at a
specified location that is either on the premises or at a place where the tenant has  made all previ-
ous rent payments in person; and
(c) The place so specified is available to the tenant for payment throughout the period  of the
notice.
SECTION 59.
 ORS 105.124 is amended to read:
105.124. For a complaint described in ORS 105.123, if  ORS chapter 90 applies to the dwelling
unit:
(1) The complaint must be in substantially the following form and be available from  the clerk
of the court:
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 35
_______________________________________________________________________________________
IN THE CIRCUIT COURT
FOR THE COUNTY OF
No. 
RESIDENTIAL EVICTION COMPLAINT
PLAINTIFF (Landlord or agent):
Address: 
City: 
State:  Zip: 
Telephone: 
vs.
DEFENDANT (Tenants/Occupants):
MAILING ADDRESS: 
City: 
State:  Zip: 
Telephone: 
1.
Tenants are in possession of the dwelling unit, premises or rental property described above or
located  at:
2.
Landlord is entitled to possession of the property because of:
24-hour notice for personal
injury, substantial damage, extremely
outrageous act or unlawful occupant.
ORS 90.396 or 90.403.
24-hour or 48-hour notice for
violation of a drug or alcohol
program. ORS 90.398.
24-hour notice for perpetrating
domestic violence, sexual assault or
stalking. ORS 90.445.
72-hour [or 144-hour] notice for
nonpayment of rent  in a week-to-week
tenancy. ORS 90.394  (1).
7-day notice with stated cause in
a week-to-week tenancy. ORS 90.392 (6).
10-day notice for a pet violation,
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 36
a repeat violation in a month-to-month
tenancy or without stated cause in a
week-to-week tenancy. ORS 90.392 (5),
90.405 or 90.427 (2).
10-day or 13-day notice for nonpayment
of rent. ORS 90.394 (2).
20-day notice for a repeat violation.
ORS 90.630 (5).
30-day, 60-day or 180-day notice without
stated cause in a month-to-month
tenancy. ORS 90.427 (3)(b) or (8)(a)(B)
or (C) or 90.429.
30-day notice with stated cause.
ORS 90.392, 90.630 or 90.632[ .]:
 The stated cause is for
nonpayment as defined in section 55 of
this 2023 Act.
60-day notice with stated cause.
ORS 90.632.
90-day notice with stated cause.
ORS 90.427 (5) or (7).
Notice to bona fide tenants after
foreclosure sale or termination of
fixed term tenancy after foreclosure
sale. ORS 86.782 (6)(c).
Other notice 
No notice (explain) 
A COPY OF THE NOTICE RELIED UPON, IF ANY, IS ATTACHED
3.
If the landlord uses an attorney, the  case goes to trial and the landlord wins in court, the
landlord can collect attorney fees from the defendant pursuant to ORS 90.255 and 105.137 (3).
Landlord requests judgment for possession of the premises, court costs,  disbursements and at-
torney fees.
I certify that the allegations and factual assertions in this complaint are true to  the best of my
knowledge.
Signature of landlord or agent.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(2) The complaint must  be signed by the plaintiff, or an attorney representing the plaintiff as
provided by ORCP 17, or verified by an agent or employee of the plaintiff  or an agent or employee
of an agent of the plaintiff.
(3) A copy of the notice relied upon, if any, must be attached to the complaint.
SECTION 60.
 ORS 105.135 is amended to read:
105.135. (1) Except as provided in  this section, the summons shall be served and returned as in
other actions.
(2)(a) The clerk shall calculate the first appearance, which shall be:
(A) Seven days after the judicial day next following payment of the filing fees; or
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 37
(B) If the claim for possession is brought under ORS  90.392 or 90.394 for nonpayment as
defined in section 55 of this 2023 Act,  15 days after the judicial day next following payment
of the filing fees.
(b) The clerk may delay the first  appearance by up to seven days to accommodate dates
on which a judge is unavailable to conduct the first appearance and, if  possible, to accom-
modate dates that the plaintiff has indicated unavailability.
(c) The clerk shall enter the first appearance date on the summons. [ That date shall be  seven
days after the judicial day next following payment of filing fees unless no judge is available  for first
appearance at that time, in which case the clerk may extend the  first appearance date for up to seven
additional days. At the request of the plaintiff, the clerk may enter a date more  than seven days after
the judicial day next following payment of filing fees if a judge will be available. ]
(d) If the claim for possession is  based on nonpayment as defined in section 55 of this
2023 Act, the clerk  shall include as part of the summons a copy of the notice described in
section 56 of this 2023 Act.
(3) Notwithstanding ORCP 10, by the end of the judicial  day next following the payment of filing
fees:
(a) The clerk shall mail the  summons and complaint by first class mail to the defendant at the
premises.
(b) The process server shall serve the defendant with the summons  and complaint at the prem-
ises by personal delivery to the defendant or, if  the defendant is not available for service, by at-
taching the summons and complaint in a secure manner to the main  entrance to that portion of the
premises of which the defendant has possession.
(4) A sheriff may serve a facsimile of a summons and complaint that is  transmitted to the sheriff
by a trial court administrator or another sheriff by means of  facsimile communication. A copy of the
facsimile must be attached to the sheriff’s return  of service. Before transmitting a summons and
complaint  to  a sheriff under this subsection, the person sending the facsimile must receive confir-
mation by telephone from the  sheriff’s office that a telephonic facsimile communication device is
available and operating.
(5) The process server shall indicate the manner in  which service was accomplished by promptly
filing with the clerk a certificate of service as provided by ORCP 7 F(2)(a).
(6) In the case of  premises to which ORS chapter 90 applies, the summons shall inform the de-
fendant of the procedures, rights and responsibilities of the parties as specified in ORS 105.137.
SECTION 61.  Section 8, chapter 420, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section  9, chapter 1,
Oregon Laws 2021 (second special session), is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) Section 2, chapter 420, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by  section 2 , chapter 1,
Oregon Laws 2021 (second special session)  [ of this 2021 second special session Act ], is repealed
on October 1, 2022.
(2) Section 5, chapter 420,  Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by sections 4 and 6 , chapter 1,
Oregon Laws 2021 (second special session)  [ of this 2021 second special session Act ], is repealed
on [ July 1, 2023 ] the effective date of this 2023 Act .
(3) Section 6, chapter 420, Oregon Laws 2021, is repealed on October 1, 2022.
(4) Section 7, chapter  420, Oregon Laws 2021, as amended by section 5 , chapter 1, Oregon
Laws 2021 (second special session)  [of this 2021 second special session Act ], is repealed  on October
1, 2022.
EVICTION PROCESS
SECTION 62.
 ORS 105.115 is amended to read:
105.115. (1) Except  as provided by subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the following are causes
of unlawful holding by force within the meaning of ORS 105.110, 105.123 and 105.126:
(a) When the tenant  or person in possession of any premises fails or refuses to pay rent within
10 days after the  rent is due under the lease or agreement under which the tenant or person in
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 38
possession holds, or to deliver possession of the  premises after being in default on payment of rent
for 10 days.
(b) When  the lease by its terms has expired and has not been renewed, or when the tenant or
person in possession is holding from month to  month, or year to year, and remains in possession
after notice to quit as provided in  ORS 105.120, or is holding contrary to any condition or covenant
of the lease or is holding possession without any written lease or agreement.
(c) When the owner or possessor of a recreational vehicle that  was placed or driven onto
property without the prior consent of the property owner,  operator or tenant fails to remove the
recreational vehicle. The property owner or operator is  not required to serve a notice to quit the
property before commencing an action under ORS  105.126 against a recreational vehicle owner or
possessor holding property by force as described in this paragraph.
(d) When the person in possession  of a premises remains in possession after the time when a
purchaser of the premises is entitled to possession in accordance with the provisions  of ORS 18.946
or 86.782.
(e) When the person in possession of a premises remains in  possession after the time when a
deed given in lieu of foreclosure  entitles the transferee named in the deed to possession of the
premises.
(f) When the person in  possession of a premises remains in possession after the time when a
seller is entitled to possession in accordance with the provisions of ORS 93.930 (2)(c) or  pursuant
to a judgment of strict foreclosure of a recorded contract for transfer or conveyance  of an interest
in real property.
(g) When  the person in possession of a premises remains in possession after the expiration of a
valid notice terminating  the person’s right to occupy the premises pursuant to ORS 91.120, 91.122
or 91.130.
(2) In the case of a dwelling unit to which ORS chapter 90 applies:
(a) The following are causes of unlawful holding  by force within the meaning of ORS 105.110
and 105.123:
(A) When the tenant or person in possession of any premises fails or refuses  to pay rent within
the time period required by a notice under ORS 90.392 or 90.394.
(B) When a  rental agreement by its terms has expired and has not been renewed, or when the
tenant or person  in possession remains in possession after a valid notice terminating the tenancy
pursuant to ORS chapter 90, or is holding contrary  to any valid condition or covenant of the rental
agreement or ORS chapter 90.
(b) A landlord may not file an action for the return of possession of  a dwelling unit based upon
a cause of unlawful holding by force as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection  until after the
expiration of a rental agreement for a fixed term tenancy or after the expiration of the  time period
provided in a notice terminating the tenancy.
(c) The court may dismiss a claim for possession at any  time if the complaint does not
comply with this subsection.
(3) In an action  under subsection (2) of this section, ORS chapter 90 shall be applied to deter-
mine the rights of the parties, including:
(a) Whether and in what amount rent is due;
(b) Whether a tenancy or rental agreement has been validly terminated; and
(c) Whether the tenant is entitled to remedies for retaliatory conduct  by the landlord as pro-
vided by ORS 90.385 and 90.765.
SECTION 63.
 ORS 105.137 is amended to read:
105.137. In the case of a dwelling unit to which ORS chapter 90 applies:
(1) [ If the  plaintiff appears and the defendant fails to appear at the first appearance, ] A default
judgment shall be entered in favor of the plaintiff for possession of  the premises and costs and
disbursements[.] only if:
(a) The plaintiff appears and the defendant fails to appear at the first appearance;
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 39
(b) The court determines that the complaint  complies with ORS 105.115 and 105.124 and
is sufficient to state a cause of action for possession; and
(c) The plaintiff testifies under oath or submits an affidavit or  declaration under penalty
of perjury stating that, as of the date of the testimony:
(A) The plaintiff does not have knowledge that the defendant has delivered  possession to
the plaintiff as described in ORS 90.147 (2); and
(B) The plaintiff reasonably believes that the  defendant remains in possession of the
premises.
(2) If the defendant  appears and the plaintiff fails to appear at the first appearance, a default
judgment shall be entered in favor  of the defendant dismissing the plaintiff’s complaint and awarding
costs and disbursements.
(3) An attorney at law shall be entitled to appear on  behalf of any party, but attorney fees may
not be awarded to the plaintiff if the defendant does not contest the action.
(4) If the plaintiff dismisses the  action before the first appearance, a judgment of dismissal shall
be entered in favor of the defendant dismissing the plaintiff’s complaint and awarding  costs and
disbursements. The defendant may not recover attorney fees for prejudgment legal  services provided
after the delivery of written notice of the dismissal by the plaintiff to the defendant, or to an  at-
torney for the defendant, in the manner provided under ORS 90.155.
(5) The plaintiff or an agent of the  plaintiff may obtain a continuance of the action for as long
as the plaintiff or the agent of the plaintiff deems  necessary to obtain the services of an attorney
at law.
(6) If  both parties appear in court on the date contained in the summons, the court shall set the
matter for trial [ as soon as practicable, ] unless  the court is advised by the parties that the matter
has been settled. The trial shall be scheduled :
(a) For a claim based  on nonpayment, as defined in section 55 of this 2023 Act, no earlier
than 15 days, and no later than 30 days, following the appearance; or
(b) For any other  claim, as soon as practicable and no later than 15 days from the date of
[such] the  appearance.
(7) If the matter is not tried  within the [ 15-day] period  described in subsection (6) of this
section, and the delay  in trial is not attributable to the landlord, the court shall order the defendant
to pay rent that is accruing into court, provided the court finds after  hearing that entry of such an
order is just and equitable.
[(7)(a)] (8)(a)  The court shall permit an unrepresented defendant to proceed to trial by directing
the defendant to file an answer in writing on a form which shall be available  from the court clerk,
and to serve a copy upon the plaintiff on the same day as first appearance.
(b) The answer shall be in substantially the following form:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
IN THE  COURT FOR
THE COUNTY OF 
(Landlord), )
)
Plaintiff(s), )
)
vs. ) No.
)
(Tenant), )
)
Defendant(s). )
ANSWER
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 40
I (we) deny that the plaintiff(s) is (are) entitled to possession because:
 The landlord did not make repairs.
List any repair problems: 
 The  landlord is attempting to evict me (us) because of my (our) complaints (or the eviction is
otherwise retaliatory).
 The landlord  is attempting to evict me because of my status as a victim of domestic violence,
sexual assault or stalking.
 The eviction notice is wrong.
 List any other defenses: 
I (we) may be entitled as the prevailing party to recover attorney fees from plaintiff(s) if I  (we)
obtain legal services to defend this action pursuant to ORS 90.255.
I (we) ask that the plaintiff(s)  not be awarded possession of the premises and that I (we) be
awarded my (our) costs and disbursements and attorney fees, if applicable, or a prevailing party fee.
Date Signature of defendant(s)
_______________________________________________________________________________________
[(8)] (9) If an unrepresented defendant files an answer as provided in subsection [ (7)] (8) of this
section, the answer [ may] does not limit the defenses available to the defendant at  trial under ORS
chapter 90. If such a defendant seeks to assert at trial a defense not fairly  raised by the answer, the
plaintiff [ shall be ] is  entitled to a reasonable continuance for the purposes of preparing  to meet the
defense.
SEALING EVICTION RECORDS
SECTION 64. Section 65 of this 2023 Act is added to  and made a part of ORS 105.105 to
105.168.
SECTION 65. (1) On an annual basis, each justice and circuit court  shall enter an order
setting aside a judgment and sealing the official records for each  case for possession brought
under ORS chapter 90 for which the court finds that:
(a) The judgment does not contain a money award or that any money award has expired
or been satisfied or discharged; and
(b)(A) The judgment was a judgment of restitution entered for the plaintiff and at least
five years have passed from the date of the judgment; or
(B) The judgment was a judgment  by stipulation of the parties under ORS 105.145 (2) and
at least 12 months have passed from the date of the judgment.
(2) Upon entry of the order, the judgment that is the  subject of the motion is deemed
not to have been  entered, and any party may answer accordingly any questions relating to
its occurrence.
(3) Nothing in this section limits the ability of a defendant to apply for  an order under
ORS 105.163.
SECTION 66. (1) Section 65 of this 2023 Act does not apply to judgments entered on or
before January 1, 2014.
(2) Each justice and circuit  court shall conduct a review of its records and enter its first
order under section 65 of this 2023 Act on or before December 31, 2024.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 41
AGRICULTURE WORKFORCE HOUSING GRANTS
SECTION 67. (1) The State Department of Agriculture shall provide grants to  improve
the health and safety conditions of existing agriculture workforce housing,  as defined in ORS
315.163, for agricultural workers and their families.
(2)(a) The department shall design an application and establish criteria  by which grants
awarded under this section are allocated and prioritized.
(b) Before a date on which rules that relate to housing  for agricultural labor are first
adopted or amended by the Occupational Safety and Health Division of the Department of
Consumer and Business Services and that is  after the effective date of this 2023 Act, the
State Department of Agriculture shall  prioritize awarding grants for housing that will com-
ply with changes to  rules that are under consideration of the agricultural labor housing
rulemaking advisory committee of the division.
(c) Within 30 days of the adoption of  rules described under paragraph (b) of this sub-
section, the State Department of  Agriculture shall update the grant application and criteria
to allow the use of grant money to comply with the new or updated rules of the division.
(3) To be eligible for a grant under this section, the housing:
(a) Must comply with all occupational safety or health laws, rules, regulations and
standards;
(b) Must  be operated by a person who holds a valid indorsement as a farmworker camp
operator under ORS 658.730, if an indorsement is required;
(c) Must be registered as a farmworker camp  with the Department of Consumer and
Business Services under ORS 658.750, if the housing is  farm employment-related housing, on
or before 90 days following the latter of:
(A) The first day of the first tax year after the grant was received; or
(B) The date the housing is first occupied;
(d) May not be housing that is required to be provided as part  of a labor contract made
under a temporary employment visa program; and
(e) Must comply with any adopted rules, as described in subsection (2)(b) of this  section.
(4) The Occupational  Safety and Health Division of the Department of Consumer and
Business Services  shall assist the State Department of Agriculture in establishing the ap-
plication and criteria under subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this section and  shall assist the de-
partment or a  contractor under subsection (5) of this section in determining eligibility for a
grant under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The State Department of Agriculture may enter into a contract  with a third party to
award or administer grants under this section.
SECTION 68.
Section 67 of this 2023 Act is repealed on January 2, 2026.
SECTION 69. In addition to and  not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out
of the General Fund, the amount of $5,000,000, to provide grants under section  67 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 69a. In addition to and not in  lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Department of Agriculture, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out
of the General  Fund, the amount of $524,762, to develop and administer the grant program
under section 67 of this 2023 Act.
EMERGENCY USE OF APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 70. Expenditures of any appropriation made for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, to the Housing and  Community Services Department, constitute an emergency as
defined in  ORS 279A.010 and may be made under procurement authority described in ORS
279B.080 without documenting the nature of the emergency, if the appropriation is made to:
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 42
(1) Address homelessness in communities within the OR-505 Oregon Balance of State
Continuum of Care; or
(2) Increase shelter  capacity and connections to shelter, support rapid rehousing initi-
atives, provide capacity support for culturally  responsive organizations and provide sanita-
tion services for  communities within the OR-505 Oregon Balance of State Continuum of Care.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 71. ORS 195.137 to 195.145 are added to  and made a part of ORS 197.286 to
197.314.
SECTION 72.  ORS 94.536 is amended to read:
94.536. As used in this section and ORS 94.538:
(1) “Conservation easement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 271.715.
(2) “Governmental unit” means a city, county, metropolitan service district  or state agency as
defined in ORS 171.133.
(3) “Holder” has the meaning given that term in ORS 271.715.
(4) “Lot” has the meaning given that term in ORS 92.010.
(5) “Parcel” has the meaning given that term in ORS 92.010.
(6) “Receiving area” means a designated  area of land to which a holder of development credits
generated from a sending area  may transfer the development credits and in which additional uses
or development, not otherwise allowed, are allowed by reason of the transfer.
(7) “Resource land” means:
(a) Lands outside  an urban growth boundary planned and zoned for farm use, forest use or mixed
farm and forest use.
(b) Lands inside or outside urban growth boundaries identified:
(A) In an acknowledged local or regional government inventory as containing significant
wetland, riparian, wildlife habitat, historic, scenic or open space resources; or
(B) As containing important natural resources,  estuaries, coastal shorelands, beaches and dunes
or other resources described in the statewide land use planning goals.
(c) “Conservation Opportunity  Areas” identified in the “Oregon Conservation Strategy” adopted
by the  State Fish and Wildlife Commission and published by the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife in September of 2006.
(8) “Sending area” means a designated area of  resource land from which development credits
generated from forgone development are  transferable, for uses or development not otherwise al-
lowed, to a receiving area.
(9) “Tract” has the meaning given that term in ORS 215.010.
(10) “Transferable development credit” means a severable development  interest in real property
that can be transferred from a lot, parcel or tract  in a sending area to a lot, parcel or tract in a
receiving  area.
(11) “Transferable development credit  system” means a land use planning tool that allows the
record owner of a lot, parcel or tract of resource land  in a sending area to voluntarily sever and
sell development interests from the  lot, parcel or tract for purchase and use by a potential developer
to develop a lot, parcel or tract in a receiving area at a higher intensity than otherwise allowed.
(12) “Urban growth boundary” has the meaning given that term in ORS [ 195.060] 197.015.
(13) “Urban reserve” has the meaning given that term in ORS 195.137.
SECTION 73.
 ORS 195.060 is amended to read:
195.060. As used in ORS 195.020[ ,] and 195.065 to 195.085 [ and 197.005], unless the context re-
quires otherwise[ :]
[(1) “District” has the meaning given that term  in ORS 198.010. In addition, the term ],
“district” or “special district” has the meaning given the term “district” in ORS 198.010 and
also includes a county service district organized under ORS chapter 451.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 43
[(2) “Urban growth boundary” means an acknowledged urban growth boundary  contained in a city
or county comprehensive plan or an acknowledged urban growth  boundary that has been adopted by
a metropolitan service district council under ORS 268.390 (3). ]
[(3) “Urban service” has the meaning given that term in ORS 195.065. ]
SECTION 74.  ORS 195.143 is amended to read:
195.143. (1) A county and [ a metropolitan service district ] Metro  must consider simultaneously
the designation and establishment of:
(a) Rural reserves pursuant to ORS 195.141; and
(b) Urban reserves pursuant to ORS 195.145 (1)(b).
(2) An agreement  [between a county and a metropolitan service district ] to establish rural reserves
pursuant to  ORS 195.141 and urban reserves pursuant to ORS 195.145 (1)(b) must provide for a co-
ordinated and concurrent process for adoption by  the county of comprehensive plan provisions and
by [ the district ] Metro of regional framework plan provisions to implement the agreement. [ A
district] Metro  may not designate urban reserves pursuant  to ORS 195.145 (1)(b) in a county until
the county and  [ the district ] Metro  have entered into an agreement pursuant to ORS 195.145 (1)(b)
that identifies  the land to be designated by [ the district in the district’s ] Metro in Metro’s  regional
framework plan as urban reserves. A county may not designate rural reserves pursuant to ORS
195.141 until the county  and [ the district ] Metro have entered into an agreement pursuant to ORS
195.141 that identifies the land to be designated as rural reserves  by the county in the county’s
comprehensive plan.
(3) A county and [ a metropolitan service district ] Metro  may not enter into an intergovernmental
agreement to designate urban reserves in the county pursuant to ORS 195.145 (1)(b) unless  the
county and [ the district ] Metro  also agree to designate rural reserves in the county.
[(4) Designation and protection of rural reserves  pursuant to ORS 195.141 or urban reserves pur-
suant to ORS 195.145 (1)(b): ]
[(a) Is not a basis for a claim for compensation under  ORS 195.305 unless the designation and
protection of  rural reserves or urban reserves imposes a new restriction on the use of private real
property.]
[(b) Does not impair the rights and immunities provided under ORS 30.930 to 30.947. ]
SECTION 75.
 ORS 195.300 is amended to read:
195.300. As  used in this section and ORS 195.301 and 195.305 to 195.336 and sections 5 to 11,
chapter 424, Oregon Laws 2007, and sections 2  to 9 and 17, chapter 855, Oregon Laws 2009, and
sections 2 to 7, chapter 8, Oregon Laws 2010:
(1) “Acquisition date” means the date described in ORS 195.328.
(2) “Claim” means a written demand for compensation filed under:
(a) ORS 195.305, as in effect immediately before December 6, 2007; or
(b) ORS 195.305 and 195.310 to 195.314, as in effect on and after December 6, 2007.
(3) “Enacted” means enacted, adopted or amended.
(4) “Fair market value” means the value of property as determined under ORS 195.332.
(5) “Farming practice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 30.930.
(6) “Federal law” means:
(a) A statute, regulation,  order, decree or policy enacted by a federal entity or by a state entity
acting under authority delegated by the federal government;
(b) A requirement contained in a plan or rule enacted by a compact entity; or
(c) A requirement contained in a permit issued by a federal or state agency pursuant  to a fed-
eral statute or regulation.
(7) “File” means to submit a document to a public entity.
(8) “Forest practice” has the meaning given that term in ORS 527.620.
(9) “Ground water restricted area” means an area designated as a critical ground water  area
or as  a ground water limited area by the Water Resources Department or Water Resources Com-
mission before December 6, 2007.
(10) “High-value farmland” means:
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 44
(a) High-value farmland as described in ORS 215.710 that is land in  an exclusive farm use zone
or a mixed farm and forest zone, except that the dates specified in ORS  215.710 (2), (4) and (6) are
December 6, 2007.
(b) Land west of U.S. Highway 101 that is composed predominantly of the  following soils in
Class III or IV or composed predominantly of a combination of the  soils described in ORS 215.710
(1) and the following soils:
(A) Subclassification IIIw, specifically Ettersburg Silt Loam and Croftland Silty Clay Loam;
(B) Subclassification IIIe, specifically Klooqueth Silty Clay Loam and Winchuck Silt Loam; and
(C) Subclassification IVw, specifically Huffling Silty Clay Loam.
(c) Land that is in an exclusive farm use zone or a mixed farm and forest zone and  that on June
28, 2007, is:
(A) Within the place of  use for a permit, certificate or decree for the use of water for irrigation
issued by the Water Resources Department;
(B) Within the boundaries of a district, as defined in ORS 540.505; or
(C) Within the boundaries of a diking district formed under ORS chapter 551.
(d) Land that contains not less than five acres planted in wine grapes.
(e) Land that is in an exclusive farm use zone and that is at an elevation between 200 and 1,000
feet above mean sea level, with an aspect between 67.5 and 292.5 degrees and a  slope between zero
and 15 percent, and that is located within:
(A) The Southern Oregon viticultural area as described in 27 C.F.R. 9.179;
(B) The Umpqua Valley viticultural area as described in 27 C.F.R. 9.89; or
(C) The Willamette Valley viticultural area as described in 27 C.F.R. 9.90.
(f) Land that is in an exclusive farm use zone and that is no more than 3,000 feet  above mean
sea level, with an aspect between 67.5 and  292.5 degrees and a slope between zero and 15 percent,
and that is located within:
(A) The portion of the Columbia Gorge viticultural area as described in  27 C.F.R. 9.178 that is
within the State of Oregon;
(B) The Rogue Valley viticultural area as described in 27 C.F.R. 9.132;
(C) The portion of the Columbia Valley viticultural area as  described in 27 C.F.R. 9.74 that is
within the State of Oregon;
(D) The portion of the Walla Walla Valley viticultural area as described in 27  C.F.R. 9.91 that
is within the State of Oregon; or
(E) The portion of the Snake River Valley viticultural area as described in 27 C.F.R. 9.208  that
is within the State of Oregon.
(11) “High-value forestland” means land:
(a) That is in a forest zone or  a mixed farm and forest zone, that is located in western Oregon
and composed predominantly of soils capable of  producing more than 120 cubic feet per acre per
year of wood fiber and that is capable of producing more than 5,000 cubic feet per year  of com-
mercial tree species; or
(b) That is in a forest  zone or a mixed farm and forest zone, that is located in eastern Oregon
and composed predominantly of soils capable of producing more than 85  cubic feet per acre per year
of wood fiber and that is capable of producing more than 4,000 cubic  feet per year of commercial
tree species.
(12) “Home site approval”  means approval of the subdivision or partition of property or approval
of the establishment of a dwelling on property.
(13) “Just compensation” means:
(a) Relief under sections 5 to 11, chapter 424, Oregon Laws 2007, sections 2 to 9  and 17, chapter
855, Oregon Laws 2009, and sections 2 to 7, chapter  8, Oregon Laws 2010, for land use regulations
enacted on or before January 1, 2007; and
(b) Relief under ORS 195.310 to 195.314 for land use regulations enacted after January 1, 2007.
(14) “Land use regulation” means:
(a) A statute that establishes a minimum lot or parcel size;
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 45
(b) A provision in ORS 227.030 to 227.300, 227.350, 227.400, 227.450 or 227.500 or in ORS  chapter
215 that restricts the residential use of private real property;
(c) A  provision of a city comprehensive plan, zoning ordinance or land division ordinance that
restricts the residential use of private real property zoned for residential use;
(d) A provision of a county comprehensive plan, zoning ordinance  or land division ordinance
that restricts the residential use of private real property;
(e) A provision, enacted or adopted on or after January 1, 2010, of:
(A) The Oregon Forest Practices Act;
(B) An administrative rule of the State Board of Forestry; or
(C) Any other law enacted,  or rule adopted, solely for the purpose of regulating a forest prac-
tice;
(f) ORS 561.191, a  provision of ORS 568.900 to 568.933 or an administrative rule of the State
Department of Agriculture that implements ORS 561.191 or 568.900 to 568.933;
(g) An administrative rule or goal of the Land Conservation and Development Commission; or
(h) A provision of a Metro functional plan that restricts the residential  use of private real
property.
(15) “Lawfully established unit of land” has the meaning given that term in ORS 92.010.
(16) “Lot” has the meaning given that term in ORS 92.010.
(17) “Measure 37 permit” means  a final decision by Metro, a city or a county to authorize the
development, subdivision or partition or other use of property pursuant to a waiver.
(18) “Owner” means:
(a) The owner of fee title to the  property as shown in the deed records of the county where the
property is located;
(b) The purchaser under a land sale contract,  if there is a recorded land sale contract in force
for the property; or
(c) If the property is owned by the trustee of a revocable trust,  the settlor of a revocable trust,
except that when the trust becomes irrevocable only the trustee is the owner.
(19) “Parcel” has the meaning given that term in ORS 92.010.
(20) “Property” means the private real  property described in a claim and contiguous private real
property that is owned by the  same owner, whether or not the contiguous property is described in
another claim, and that is not property  owned by the federal government, an Indian tribe or a public
body, as defined in ORS 192.311.
(21) “Protection of public health and safety” means a law, rule, ordinance, order, policy,  permit
or other governmental authorization that restricts a use of property in  order to reduce the risk or
consequence  of  fire, earthquake, landslide, flood, storm, pollution, disease, crime or other natural
or human disaster or threat to persons or property  including, but not limited to, building and fire
codes, health and sanitation regulations, solid or hazardous waste regulations and pollution control
regulations.
(22) “Public entity” means the state, Metro, a county or a city.
[(23) “Urban growth boundary” has the meaning given that term in ORS 195.060. ]
[(24)] (23) “Waive” or “waiver” means an action or decision of a public entity  to modify, remove
or not apply one or more land use regulations under ORS 195.305 to  195.336 and sections 5 to 11,
chapter 424, Oregon Laws 2007, sections 2 to 9 and 17, chapter 855, Oregon  Laws 2009, and sections
2 to 7, chapter 8, Oregon  Laws 2010, or ORS 195.305, as in effect immediately before December 6,
2007, to  allow the owner to use property for a use permitted when the owner acquired the property.
[(25)] (24) “Zoned for residential use” means zoning that  has as its primary purpose single-family
residential use.
SECTION 76.
 ORS 197.015 is amended to read:
197.015. As used in ORS chapters 195, 196 and 197  [ and ORS 197A.300 to 197A.325 ], unless the
context requires otherwise:
(1) “Acknowledgment” means a  commission order that certifies that a comprehensive plan and
land use regulations, land use  regulation or plan or regulation amendment complies with the goals
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 46
or certifies that Metro land use planning goals and objectives, Metro regional framework plan,
amendments to Metro planning goals  and objectives or amendments to the Metro regional frame-
work plan comply with the goals.
(2) “Board” means the Land Use Board of Appeals.
(3) “Carport” means a stationary structure consisting of a roof with its supports  and not more
than one wall, or storage cabinet substituting for a wall, and used for sheltering a motor vehicle.
(4) “Commission” means the Land Conservation and Development Commission.
(5) “Comprehensive plan” means a generalized, coordinated land use map and policy statement
of the governing body of a local government that interrelates all functional and  natural systems and
activities relating to the use of lands, including but not limited  to sewer and water systems, trans-
portation systems, educational facilities, recreational  facilities, and natural resources and air and
water quality management programs. “Comprehensive” means all-inclusive, both in  terms of the
geographic area covered and functional and natural activities and systems occurring  in the area
covered by the plan.  “General nature” means a summary of policies and proposals in broad catego-
ries and does not necessarily indicate specific locations of any area,  activity or use. A plan is “co-
ordinated” when the  needs of all levels of governments, semipublic and private agencies and the
citizens of Oregon have been considered and accommodated as much as possible. “Land”  includes
water, both surface and subsurface, and the air.
(6) “Department” means the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(7) “Director” means the Director of the Department of Land Conservation and Development.
(8) “Goals” means the mandatory statewide land use planning standards adopted by the  com-
mission pursuant to ORS chapters 195, 196 and 197.
(9) “Guidelines” means suggested approaches designed to  aid cities and counties in preparation,
adoption and implementation of comprehensive plans in compliance with goals and  to aid state
agencies and special districts in the preparation, adoption  and implementation of plans, programs
and regulations in compliance with  goals. Guidelines [ shall be advisory and shall ] are advisory and
do not limit state agencies, cities, counties and special districts to a single approach.
(10) “Land use decision”:
(a) Includes:
(A) A final decision or determination made by a local government  or special district that con-
cerns the adoption, amendment or application of:
(i) The goals;
(ii) A comprehensive plan provision;
(iii) A land use regulation; or
(iv) A new land use regulation;
(B) A final decision  or determination of a state agency other than the commission with respect
to which the agency is required to apply the goals; or
(C) A decision of a county planning commission made under ORS 433.763;
(b) Does not include a decision of a local government:
(A) That is made under land use standards that do  not require interpretation or the exercise
of policy or legal judgment;
(B) That approves or denies a building permit issued under clear and  objective land use stand-
ards;
(C) That is a limited land use decision;
(D) That determines  final engineering design, construction, operation, maintenance, repair or
preservation  of  a transportation facility that is otherwise authorized by and consistent with the
comprehensive plan and land use regulations;
(E) That is an expedited land division as described in ORS 197.360;
(F) That approves, pursuant to ORS 480.450 (7), the siting, installation, maintenance  or removal
of a liquefied petroleum gas container or receptacle regulated exclusively by the State  Fire Marshal
under ORS 480.410 to 480.460;
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 47
(G) That approves or denies approval of a final subdivision or partition plat or  that determines
whether a final subdivision or partition plat  substantially conforms to the tentative subdivision or
partition plan; or
(H) That a proposed state agency action  subject to ORS 197.180 (1) is compatible with the ac-
knowledged comprehensive plan and land use regulations implementing the plan, if:
(i) The local government has already made a land use decision  authorizing a use or activity that
encompasses the proposed state agency action;
(ii) The  use or activity that would be authorized, funded or undertaken by the proposed state
agency action is allowed without review under  the acknowledged comprehensive plan and land use
regulations implementing the plan; or
(iii) The use or activity that would be authorized, funded or undertaken  by the proposed state
agency action requires  a future land use review under the acknowledged comprehensive plan and
land use regulations implementing the plan;
(c) Does not include a decision by a school district to close a school;
(d) Does not  include, except as provided in ORS 215.213 (13)(c) or 215.283 (6)(c), authorization
of an outdoor mass gathering as defined in ORS 433.735, or  other gathering of fewer than 3,000
persons that is not anticipated to continue for more than 120 hours in any three-month period; and
(e) Does not include:
(A) A writ of mandamus issued by a circuit court in accordance with ORS 215.429 or 227.179;
(B) Any  local decision or action taken on an application subject to ORS 215.427 or 227.178 after
a petition for a writ of mandamus has been filed under ORS 215.429 or 227.179; or
(C) A state agency action subject to ORS 197.180 (1), if:
(i) The local government with land use jurisdiction over a use  or activity that would be au-
thorized, funded or undertaken by  the state agency as a result of the state agency action has al-
ready made a land use decision approving the use or activity; or
(ii) A use or  activity that would be authorized, funded or undertaken by the state agency as a
result of the  state agency action is allowed without review under the acknowledged comprehensive
plan and land use regulations implementing the plan.
(11) “Land use regulation” means any local government  zoning ordinance, land division ordi-
nance adopted under ORS 92.044 or 92.046 or similar general  ordinance establishing standards for
implementing a comprehensive plan.
(12) “Limited land use decision”:
(a) Means a final decision or determination made by a local government pertaining to a  site
within an urban growth boundary that concerns:
(A) The approval or denial of a tentative subdivision or partition plan,  as described in ORS
92.040 (1).
(B) The approval or denial of an application based on discretionary standards designed to  reg-
ulate the physical characteristics of a use permitted outright, including but not  limited to site re-
view and design review.
(b) Does not mean a final decision made  by a local government pertaining to a site within an
urban growth boundary that concerns approval or denial of a final subdivision or partition plat  or
that determines whether a final subdivision or partition plat  substantially conforms to the tentative
subdivision or partition plan.
(13) “Local government” means any  city, county or [ metropolitan service district formed under
ORS chapter 268 ] Metro or an association of local governments performing land use planning func-
tions under ORS 195.025.
(14) “Metro” means a metropolitan service district organized under ORS chapter 268.
(15) “Metro planning goals and objectives” means the  land use goals and objectives that [ a
metropolitan service district ] Metro  may adopt  under ORS 268.380 (1)(a). The goals and objectives
do not constitute a comprehensive plan.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 48
(16) “Metro regional framework  plan” means the regional framework plan required by the 1992
Metro Charter or its separate components. Neither the regional  framework plan nor its individual
components constitute a comprehensive plan.
(17) “New land use regulation” means a land use regulation other than an amendment to an
acknowledged land use regulation adopted by a local government that already  has a comprehensive
plan and land regulations acknowledged under ORS 197.251.
(18) “Person” means any individual, partnership,  corporation, association, governmental subdi-
vision or agency or public  or private organization of any kind. The Land Conservation and Devel-
opment Commission or its designee is considered a person for purposes of  appeal under ORS
chapters 195 and 197.
(19) “Special  district” means any unit of local government, other than a city, county, [ metropol-
itan service district formed under ORS chapter 268 ] Metro or  an association of local governments
performing land use planning functions under ORS 195.025, authorized and  regulated by statute and
includes but is not limited to water control  districts, domestic water associations and water coop-
eratives, irrigation districts, port districts,  regional air quality control authorities, fire districts,
school districts, hospital districts, mass transit districts and sanitary districts.
(20) “Urban growth boundary” means an acknowledged urban growth boundary  contained
in a city or county comprehensive plan or adopted by Metro under ORS 268.390 (3).
[(20)] (21) “Urban unincorporated community” means an area designated in a county’s ac-
knowledged comprehensive plan as an urban unincorporated community after December 5, 1994.
[(21)] (22)  “Voluntary association  of local governments” means a regional planning agency in
this state officially designated by the Governor  pursuant to the federal Office of Management and
Budget Circular A-95 as a regional clearinghouse.
[(22)] (23) “Wetlands” means those  areas that are inundated or saturated by surface or ground
water at a frequency and duration  that are sufficient to support, and that under normal circum-
stances  do  support, a prevalence of vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions.
SECTION 77.  ORS 197.298 is amended to read:
197.298. (1) In addition to any requirements established by rule addressing urbanization,  land
may not be included within an urban growth boundary of Metro except under the  following priori-
ties:
(a) First priority is land that is designated urban reserve land under ORS 195.145, rule  or [ met-
ropolitan service district ] Metro  action plan.
(b) If  land under paragraph (a) of this subsection is inadequate to accommodate the amount of
land needed, second priority is land adjacent to an urban growth boundary that is identified in an
acknowledged comprehensive plan as an exception area or nonresource land. Second priority may
include resource land that is  completely surrounded by exception areas unless such resource land
is high-value farmland as described in ORS 215.710.
(c) If land under  paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection is inadequate to accommodate the
amount of land needed,  third priority is land designated as marginal land pursuant to ORS 197.247
(1991 Edition).
(d) If land under paragraphs (a) to (c) of this subsection is  inadequate to accommodate the
amount of land  needed, fourth priority is land designated in an acknowledged comprehensive plan
for agriculture or forestry, or both.
(2) Under this section,  higher priority [ shall] must be  given to land of lower capability as
measured by the capability classification system or  by cubic foot site class, whichever is appropriate
for the current use.
(3) Land of lower priority under [ subsection (1) of ] this  section may be included in an urban
growth boundary if land  of higher priority is found to be inadequate to accommodate the amount
of land estimated in subsection (1) of this section for one or more of the following reasons:
(a) Specific types of identified land  needs cannot be reasonably accommodated on higher priority
lands;
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 49
(b) Future urban  services could not reasonably be provided to the higher priority lands due to
topographical or other physical constraints; or
(c) Maximum efficiency of land uses within a proposed urban growth boundary  requires inclu-
sion of lower priority lands in order to include or to provide services to higher priority lands.
[(4) When a city includes land within the urban growth boundary of the  city pursuant to ORS
197.286 to 197.314, the city shall prioritize lands for inclusion as provided in ORS 197A.320. ]
SECTION 78.  ORS 197.299 is amended to read:
197.299. (1) [ A metropolitan service district organized under ORS chapter 268 ] Metro  shall  com-
plete the inventory, determination and analysis required under ORS 197.296 (3) not  later than six
years after completion of the previous inventory, determination and analysis.
(2)(a) [ The metropolitan service district ] Metro shall take such action as necessary under ORS
197.296 (6)(a) to accommodate one-half of a 20-year buildable land supply determined under ORS
197.296 (3) within one year of completing the analysis.
(b) [ The metropolitan service district ] Metro  shall take all final action  under ORS 197.296 (6)(a)
necessary to accommodate a 20-year buildable land supply determined under  ORS 197.296 (3) within
two years of completing the analysis.
(c) The metropolitan service district shall take  action under ORS 197.296 (6)(b), within one year
after the analysis required under  ORS 197.296 (3)(b) is completed, to provide sufficient buildable land
within the urban growth boundary to accommodate the estimated housing  needs for 20 years from
the time the actions are completed.
(d) The  metropolitan service district shall consider and adopt new measures that the governing
body deems appropriate under ORS 197.296 (6)(b).
(3) The commission may grant an extension  to the time limits of subsection (2) of this section
if the Director of the Department of Land Conservation  and Development determines that the met-
ropolitan service district has provided good cause for failing to meet the time limits.
(4)(a) [ The metropolitan service district ] Metro  shall establish a process to expand the urban
growth boundary to accommodate a need for  land for a public school that cannot reasonably be
accommodated within the existing urban growth boundary. [ The metropolitan service district ] Metro
shall design the process to:
(A) Accommodate  a need that must be accommodated between periodic analyses of urban growth
boundary capacity required by subsection (1) of this section; and
(B) Provide for a final decision on a proposal to  expand the urban growth boundary within four
months after submission of a complete application by a large school district  as defined in ORS
195.110.
(b) At the request of a large school district, [ the metropolitan  service district ] Metro  shall assist
the [ large school ] district to identify school sites required by the school facility planning process
described in ORS 195.110. A need for  a public school is a specific type of identified land need under
ORS 197.298 (3).
(5) At least  three years after completing its most recent demonstration  of sufficient buildable
lands under ORS 197.296, [ a metropolitan service district ] Metro may, on a single occasion, revise the
determination and analysis required as part of the demonstration for the  purpose of considering an
amendment to the [ metropolitan service district’s ] Metro’s  urban growth boundary, provided:
[(a) The  metropolitan service district has entered into an intergovernmental agreement and has
designated rural reserves and urban reserves under ORS 195.141 and 195.145  with each county located
within the district; ]
[(b) The commission has acknowledged the  rural reserve and urban reserve designations described
in paragraph (a) of this subsection; ]
[(c)] (a)  One or  more cities within [ the metropolitan service district ] Metro  have proposed a de-
velopment that would require expansion of the urban growth boundary;
[(d)] (b) The city or cities proposing the development have provided evidence to [ the metropolitan
service district ] Metro  that  the proposed development would provide additional needed housing to
the needed housing included in the most recent determination and analysis;
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 50
[(e)] (c)  The location chosen for the proposed development is adjacent to the  city proposing the
development; and
[(f)] (d) The location  chosen for the proposed development is located within an area designated
and acknowledged as an urban reserve.
(6)(a) If [ a metropolitan service district ] Metro , after revising its most recent determination and
analysis pursuant  to subsection (5) of this section, concludes that an expansion of its urban growth
boundary is warranted,  [the metropolitan service district ] Metro  may take action to expand its urban
growth boundary in one or more locations to accommodate the proposed development, provided  the
urban growth boundary expansion does not exceed a total of 1,000 acres.
(b) [ A metropolitan service district that ] If Metro  expands its urban  growth boundary under this
subsection , Metro :
(A) Must adopt the urban growth boundary expansion not  more than four years after completing
its most recent demonstration of sufficient buildable lands under ORS 197.296; and
(B) Is  exempt from the boundary location requirements described in the statewide land use
planning goals relating to urbanization.
SECTION 79.  ORS 197.302 is amended to read:
197.302. (1) After gathering and compiling information on the performance measures as described
in ORS 197.301 but prior to submitting the information to the Department of Land  Conservation and
Development, [ a metropolitan service  district ] Metro  shall determine if actions taken under ORS
197.296 (6) have established the buildable  land supply and housing densities necessary to accommo-
date estimated housing needs determined under ORS 197.296 (3). If [ the metropolitan service district ]
Metro determines  that the actions undertaken will not accommodate estimated need, [ the district ]
Metro shall develop a corrective action plan, including a  schedule for implementation. [ The
district] Metro  shall  submit the plan to the department along with the report on performance
measures required under ORS 197.301. Corrective action under this  section may include amendment
of the urban growth boundary,  [ comprehensive plan, ] regional framework plan, functional plan or
land use regulations as described in ORS 197.296  (6)(b).
(2) Within two years of submitting a corrective action plan to the department, [ the metropolitan
service district ] Metro shall demonstrate by reference to the performance measures described in ORS
197.301 that implementation of the plan has resulted in the buildable land supply and  housing den-
sity within the urban growth boundary necessary to accommodate the estimated housing needs for
each housing type as determined under ORS 197.296 (3).
(3) The failure of [ the metropolitan service district ] Metro  to demonstrate the buildable land
supply and housing density necessary to accommodate housing needs as required  under this section
and ORS 197.296 may be the basis for initiation of enforcement action pursuant to ORS 197.319  to
197.335.
SECTION 80.
 ORS 197.304 is amended to read:
197.304. (1) Notwithstanding an  intergovernmental agreement pursuant to ORS 190.003 to
190.130 or acknowledged comprehensive plan provisions to the contrary, a city within Lane County
[that has a population of 50,000 or more within its boundaries ] with a population  of 50,000 or
greater shall meet its  obligation under ORS 197.286 to 197.314 separately from any other city within
Lane County. The city shall, separately from any other city:
(a) Establish an urban  growth boundary, consistent with the jurisdictional area of responsibility
specified in the acknowledged comprehensive plan; and
(b) Demonstrate, as required by [ ORS 197.296 ] section 22 of this 2023 Act , that its compre-
hensive plan provides sufficient buildable lands within an  urban growth boundary [ established pur-
suant to statewide planning goals to accommodate estimated housing needs for 20 years ] to
accommodate needed housing.
(2) Except as provided  in subsection (1) of this section, this section does not alter or affect an
intergovernmental agreement pursuant to ORS 190.003  to 190.130 or acknowledged comprehensive
plan provisions adopted by Lane County or local governments in Lane County.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 51
SECTION 81.  ORS 197.307, as amended by section 14, chapter  401, Oregon Laws 2019, and
section 2, chapter 54, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
197.307. (1) The availability of  affordable, decent, safe and sanitary housing opportunities for
persons of lower,  middle and fixed income, including agriculture workforce  housing [ for
farmworkers], is a matter of statewide concern.
(2) Many persons of lower, middle and fixed income depend on government  assisted housing as
a source of affordable, decent, safe and sanitary housing.
(3) [When a need has  been shown for housing within an urban growth boundary at particular price
ranges and rent levels, needed housing shall be permitted ] A local government shall permit needed
housing in one or more zoning districts or in zones described  by some comprehensive plans as
overlay zones with sufficient buildable land to satisfy that need.
(4) Except  as provided in subsection (6) of this section, a local government may adopt and apply
only clear and objective standards, conditions and procedures  regulating the development of hous-
ing, including needed housing. The standards, conditions and procedures:
(a) May include, but are not limited to, one or more provisions regulating  the density or height
of a development.
(b) May not have the effect, either in themselves or cumulatively, of  discouraging needed hous-
ing through unreasonable cost or delay.
(5) The provisions of subsection (4) of this section do not apply to:
(a) An application or permit for residential development in an area identified in  a formally
adopted central city plan, or a regional center as defined by Metro, in a city with a population of
500,000 or [ more] greater .
(b) An application  or permit for residential development in historic areas designated for pro-
tection under a land use planning goal protecting historic areas.
(6) In addition to an approval process for needed housing based on clear and objective  stand-
ards, conditions and procedures as  provided in subsection (4) of this section, a local government may
adopt and apply an alternative  approval process for applications and permits for residential devel-
opment based on approval criteria regulating, in whole or in part, appearance or aesthetics that  are
not clear and objective if:
(a) The applicant retains the option  of proceeding under the approval process that meets the
requirements of subsection (4) of this section;
(b) The approval criteria for the  alternative approval process comply with applicable statewide
land use planning goals and rules; and
(c) The approval criteria for the alternative approval process authorize a density at  or above
the density level authorized in the zone under  the approval process provided in subsection (4) of this
section.
(7) Subject to subsection (4)  of this section, this section does not infringe on a local
government’s prerogative to:
(a) Set approval standards under which a particular housing type is permitted outright;
(b) Impose special conditions upon approval of a specific development proposal; or
(c) Establish approval procedures.
SECTION 82.
 ORS 197.313 is amended to read:
197.313. [ Nothing in ORS 197.312 or in the amendments to ORS 197.286,  197.303, 197.307 by
sections 1, 2  and 3, chapter 795, Oregon Laws 1983, shall be construed to ] ORS 197.286 to 197.314
do not  require a city or  county to contribute to the financing, administration or sponsorship of
government assisted housing.
SECTION 83. ORS 197.314 is added to and made a part of ORS 197.475 to 197.490.
SECTION 84.  ORS 197.480 is amended to read:
197.480. (1) Each city  and county governing body shall provide[ , in accordance with urban growth
management agreements, ] for  mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks as an allowed use[ , by
July 1, 1990, or by the next periodic review after January 1, 1988, whichever comes first ]:
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 52
(a) By zoning ordinance  and by comprehensive plan designation on buildable lands within urban
growth boundaries; and
(b) In areas planned  and zoned for a residential density of six to 12 units per acre sufficient to
accommodate the need established pursuant to subsections (2) and (3) of this section.
(2) A city or county shall establish  a projection of need for mobile home or manufactured
dwelling parks based on:
(a) Population projections;
(b) Household income levels;
(c) Housing market trends of the region; and
(d) An inventory of mobile home or manufactured dwelling  parks sited in areas planned and
zoned or generally used for commercial, industrial or high density residential development.
(3) The inventory required by subsection (2)(d) and subsection (4)  of this section shall establish
the need for  areas to be planned and zoned to accommodate the potential displacement of the in-
ventoried mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks.
(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of  subsection (1) of this section, a city or county within [ a
metropolitan service district, established pursuant to ORS chapter 268 ] Metro , shall inventory  the
mobile home or manufactured  dwelling parks sited in areas planned and zoned or generally used for
commercial, industrial or high density residential development [ no later than two  years from Sep-
tember 27, 1987 ].
(5)(a) A city or county may establish clear and objective criteria and standards for  the place-
ment and design of mobile home or manufactured dwelling parks.
(b) If a city  or county requires a hearing before approval of a mobile home or manufactured
dwelling park, application  of the criteria and standards adopted pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection shall be the sole issue to be determined at the hearing.
(c) No criteria or standards established under paragraph (a) of this subsection [ shall] may  be
adopted which would preclude the development of mobile home or manufactured  dwelling parks
within the intent of ORS [ 197.286 and] 197.475 to 197.490.
SECTION 85.
 ORS 197.522 is amended to read:
197.522. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Needed housing” has the meaning given that term in ORS [ 197.303] 197.286.
(b) “Partition” has the meaning given that term in ORS 92.010.
(c) “Permit” means a permit as defined in ORS 215.402 and a permit as defined in ORS  227.160.
(d) “Subdivision” has the meaning given that term in ORS 92.010.
(2) A local government  shall approve an application for a permit, authorization or other ap-
proval necessary for the subdivision or partitioning of, or construction  on, any land for needed
housing that is consistent with the comprehensive plan and applicable land use regulations.
(3) If an application is inconsistent with the comprehensive plan and applicable land  use regu-
lations, the local government, prior to  making a final decision on the application, shall allow the
applicant to offer an amendment or to propose conditions of approval that would make  the applica-
tion consistent with the plan and applicable regulations.  If an applicant seeks to amend the appli-
cation or propose conditions of approval:
(a) A county may extend the time limitation under  ORS 215.427 for final action by the governing
body of a county on an application for needed housing and may  set forth a new time limitation for
final action on the consideration of future amendments or proposals.
(b) A city may  extend the time limitation under ORS 227.178 for final action by the governing
body of a city on an application for needed housing and  may set forth a new time limitation for final
action on the consideration of future amendments or proposals.
(4) A local government shall  deny an application that is inconsistent with the comprehensive
plan and applicable land use regulations and that  cannot be made consistent through amendments
to the application or the imposition of reasonable conditions of approval.
SECTION 86.
ORS 197.637 and 197.764 are added to and made a part of ORS 197.286 to
197.314.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 53
SECTION 87.  ORS 197.637 is amended to read:
197.637. (1) Upon request of the Department  of Land Conservation and Development, the Hous-
ing and  Community Services Department shall review the inventory and analysis of housing, and
measures taken to address the housing need,  required of certain local governments under ORS
197.296 or 197.297 or section 21 or 22 of this 2023 Act . The review shall address the  likely effect
of measures and housing production strategies  developed by a local government [ under ORS
197.296 (6) or (7) ] on the adequacy of the supply of buildable land and [ opportunities to  satisfy needs
identified under ORS 197.296 (3) ] measures to address needed housing .
(2) The Land Conservation and Development Commission  and the Director of the Department
of Land Conservation  and Development shall consider the review and any recommendations of the
Housing and Community Services Department when determining whether a  local government has
complied with the statewide land use  planning goals and the requirements of ORS 197.296  or 197.297
or section 21 or 22 of this 2023 Act .
SECTION 88.  ORS 197.764 is amended to read:
197.764. (1) A local  government may make a land use decision to  approve an application to
remove a lot or parcel from within an urban growth boundary if:
(a) The application is submitted by the owner of the lot or parcel;
(b)(A) The lot or parcel is adjacent to the edge of the urban growth boundary; or
(B) The lot or parcel is adjacent to another lot or parcel that is removed under this section;
(c) The lot or parcel is assessed under ORS 308A.050 to 308A.128 for its value for farm use;
(d) The lot or parcel is not within the boundaries of a city; and
(e) The lot or parcel is not included  in an area identified for urban services under ORS 197.754.
(2) A local government, in  deciding whether to approve an application under subsection (1) of
this section, shall consider:
(a) The  projected costs and other consequences of extending urban services to the affected lot
or parcel;
(b) The potential value in the investment of providing urban services to the affected lot or par-
cel;
(c) Any requirement for expanding  the urban growth boundary in other areas to compensate for
any loss in buildable lands; and
(d) The projected  costs and other consequences of providing urban services to other areas
brought in under an expanded urban growth boundary.
(3)(a) Land that is removed from  within an urban growth boundary pursuant to an application
approved under this section shall be removed from any inventory of buildable lands maintained  by
the local government.
(b) A local government that approves an application under this  section shall either expand the
urban growth boundary to compensate for  any resulting reduction in available buildable lands or
increase the development capacity of the remaining supply  of buildable lands  consistent with ORS
197.296 (6) or 197A.300 to 197A.325 or section 21 or 22 of this 2023 Act .
SECTION 89.
ORS 197.766 is repealed.
SECTION 90.  ORS 197.831 is amended to read:
197.831. In a proceeding before the Land Use Board of Appeals or an appellate court that  in-
volves an ordinance required to contain clear and objective  approval standards, conditions and
procedures for [ needed] housing, including under ORS 197.307, the  local government imposing the
provisions of the ordinance shall  demonstrate that the approval standards, conditions and proce-
dures are capable of being imposed only in a clear and objective manner.
SECTION 91. ORS 197A.300 to 197A.325 are  added to and made a part of ORS 197.286 to
197.314.
SECTION 92.  ORS 197A.300 is amended to read:
197A.300. As used in ORS 197A.300 to 197A.325[ :],
[(1) “Buildable lands”  means land in urban or urbanizable areas that are suitable for urban
uses.]
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 54
[(2)] “serviceable” means, with respect to land, that:
[(a)] (1)  Adequate sewer, water  and transportation capacity for planned urban development is
available or can be either provided or made subject to committed financing; or
[(b)] (2) Committed financing can be in  place to provide adequate sewer, water and transporta-
tion capacity for planned urban development.
SECTION 93.  ORS 197A.310 is amended to read:
197A.310. (1) [ In addition to and not in lieu of ] As an alternative to  the method  prescribed in
[ORS 197.286 to 197.314 and the statewide land use planning goals ] section 22 (5)(a)  of this 2023
Act, the Land Conservation and Development  Commission shall adopt a method by which a city
outside Metro that has a population of less than 10,000 may  evaluate or amend its urban growth
boundary.
(2) The commission shall design the method so that:
(a) A city using the method:
(A) Will have within its boundaries sufficient buildable lands and other development  capacity,
including land and capacity for needed housing and employment opportunities, to  meet the growth
in population and employment forecast to occur over a 14-year period.
(B) Will not become less efficient in its use of land as  a result of a change to the urban growth
boundary.
(b) The urban population per  square mile will continue, subject to market conditions, to increase
over time on a statewide basis and in major regions  of the state, including that portion of the
Willamette Valley outside of Metro.
(c) The rate of conversion of agricultural and forest lands to urban  uses does not increase over
time in any major region of the state.
(3) Under the method adopted by the commission:
(a) A city’s determination  of the amount of buildable lands [ needed for ] sufficient for needed
housing, employment and other urban uses must be based on the population and employment  growth
forecast to occur over a 14-year period.
(b) A city’s determination of the  supply and development capacity of lands within its urban
growth boundary must be based on:
(A) A simple inventory of vacant  and partially vacant buildable lands within the urban growth
boundary;
(B) The comprehensive plan designation and  the zoning of the portion of the buildable lands that
is urban; and
(C) Simple factors established by the commission for forecasting:
(i) The development and redevelopment capacity  of urbanizable lands within the urban growth
boundary; and
(ii) The redevelopment capacity of developed urban lands within the urban growth boundary.
(c) A city’s determination of the supply and development capacity of  lands the city proposes to
include within the urban growth boundary must be based on:
(A) A simple inventory of vacant and partially vacant lands; and
(B) Simple factors established by the commission for forecasting the development and  redevel-
opment capacity of the lands.
(d) A city shall demonstrate that lands included within the urban growth boundary:
(A) Include sufficient serviceable land for at least a seven-year period.
(B) Can all be serviceable over a 14-year period.
(e) Lands included within the urban growth boundary:
(A) Must be planned and zoned for categories of land uses in amounts that are  roughly propor-
tional to the land need determined for each category of use;
(B) Must be planned and zoned for an intensity of use that  is generally consistent with the es-
timates that were used to determine the amount of land needed;
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 55
(C) Must be planned and zoned to meet the requirements  for needed housing, and those re-
quirements must be specified by rule of the commission in a manner that is as objective as  practi-
cable; and
(D) May be either:
(i) Planned and zoned, or otherwise conditioned, to avoid significantly affecting a  state highway,
a state highway interchange or a freight route designated in the Oregon Highway Plan; or
(ii) Allowed to significantly affect a  state highway, a state highway interchange or a freight
route designated in the Oregon Highway Plan subject  to mitigation, consistent with rules of the
commission, if the lands are planned and zoned for compact urban development or industrial uses.
(4) For purposes of subsection (3)(a) of  this section, population growth must be forecast as pro-
vided in ORS 195.033. Employment growth must be forecast based on the population growth forecast
for the city or the employment growth forecast issued by the Employment Department for the county
or region. The commission shall  establish factors, by rule, for converting the forecasted population
and employment growth  into forecasts of land need for housing, employment and other categories
of uses. The factors must:
(a) Be based on an empirical evaluation of the relation between population and  employment
growth and the rate and trends of land utilization in the recent past in the  applicable major region
of the state;
(b) Reflect consideration by the commission of any significant  changes occurring or expected to
occur in the markets for urban land uses in that major region of the state;
(c) Be  designed to encourage an increase in the land use efficiency of a city, subject to market
conditions; and
(d) Provide a range of policy choices for a city about the form of its future growth.
(5) For purposes of subsection (3)(b) of this section, the commission shall establish factors  for
supply and development capacity that are:
(a) Based on an empirical evaluation of the population and employment growth that has  oc-
curred on similarly situated lands through development and redevelopment;
(b) Based on consideration by the commission of any  significant changes occurring or expected
to occur in the markets for urban land uses in that major region of the state;
(c) Designed to encourage an increase in the land use efficiency of the city, subject to market
conditions;  and
(d) Designed to provide a range of policy choices for a  city about the form of its future growth.
(6) For purposes  of subsection (3)(c) of this section, the commission shall establish factors that
are:
(a) Based on an empirical evaluation of the population and employment growth that has  oc-
curred on similarly situated lands through development and redevelopment;
(b) Based on consideration by the commission of any  significant changes occurring or expected
to occur in the markets for urban land uses in each major region of the state;
(c) Designed to encourage an increase in the land use efficiency of the city, subject to market
conditions;  and
(d) Designed to provide a range of policy choices for a  city about the form of its future growth.
(7) For lands that are included within an urban growth boundary pursuant  to this section and
not made serviceable within 20 years  after the date of their inclusion, the commission may provide
by rule that:
(a) The lands must be removed from within the urban growth boundary  the next time the city
evaluates the urban growth boundary; or
(b) The planned development capacity of  the lands must be reduced if there are significant in-
creases in the cost of making the lands serviceable.
(8) When lands  included within the urban growth boundary pursuant to this section are planned
and zoned for industrial or  residential uses, the lands must remain planned and zoned for the use
unless a rule of the commission allows a change  in planning and zoning based on a significant
change in circumstance.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 56
SECTION 94.  ORS 197A.305 is amended to read:
197A.305. (1) [ In addition to and not in lieu of ] As an alternative to  the method  prescribed in
[ORS 197.286 to 197.314 and the statewide land use planning goals ] section 22 (5)(a)  of this 2023
Act, the Land Conservation and Development Commission shall adopt by rule methods by which  a
city that is outside Metro may evaluate or amend the urban growth boundary of the city.
(2) A city outside Metro may use the methods adopted pursuant to:
(a) ORS 197A.310 if the city has a population of less than 10,000.
(b) ORS 197A.312 if the city has a population of 10,000 or [ more] greater .
(3) A city that elects to include land within the urban growth  boundary of the city under a
method established pursuant to ORS 197A.310 or 197A.312:
(a) May use the method again when:
(A) The population of the  city has grown by at least 50 percent of the amount of growth forecast
to occur in conjunction with the previous use of the method by the city; or
(B) At least one-half of the lands identified as buildable lands  during the previous use of the
method by the city have been developed.
(b) Shall evaluate whether the city needs to include within the urban growth boundary addi-
tional land for residential or employment uses before the population of  the city has grown by 100
percent of the population growth forecast to  occur in conjunction with the previous use of the
method by the city.
(4) A city that elects to use a method established pursuant to ORS 197A.310 or 197A.312 shall
notify the Department of Land Conservation and Development of the election in the manner required
by ORS 197.610 for notice of  a post-acknowledgment plan amendment. The city may revoke the
election  until  the city makes a final decision whether to amend the urban growth boundary of the
city. A city  that has initiated, but not completed, an amendment of its urban growth boundary before
January 1, 2014, may withdraw the  proposed amendment and use a method established pursuant to
ORS 197A.310 or 197A.312 by filing notice of the  election with the department in the manner re-
quired by ORS 197.610 and 197.615 for notice of a post-acknowledgment plan amendment.
(5) Beginning on or before January 1, 2023, the commission shall:
(a) Evaluate, every five years, the impact of the implementation of ORS 197A.310 (2) and
197A.312 (2) on the population  per square mile, livability in the area, the provision and cost of urban
facilities and services, the rate of  conversion of agriculture and forest lands and other consider-
ations;
(b) Consider changes  to the statewide land use planning goals or rules to address adverse out-
comes; and
(c) Make recommendations to the Legislative Assembly, as necessary, for statutory changes.
SECTION 95.
 ORS 197A.312 is amended to read:
197A.312. (1) [ In addition to and not in lieu of ] As an alternative to  the method  prescribed in
[ORS 197.286 to 197.314 and the statewide land use planning goals ] section 22 (5)(a)  of this 2023
Act, the Land Conservation and Development  Commission shall adopt a method by which a city
outside Metro that has a population of 10,000 or [ more] greater may evaluate or amend its urban
growth boundary.
(2) The commission shall design the method so that:
(a) A city using the method:
(A) Will have within its boundaries sufficient buildable lands and other development  capacity,
including land and capacity for needed housing and employment opportunities, to  meet the growth
in population and employment forecast to occur over a 14-year period.
(B) Will not become less efficient in its use of land as  a result of a change to the urban growth
boundary.
(b) The urban population per square mile will continue to increase over time on a statewide
basis and in major regions of the state, including  that portion of the Willamette Valley outside of
Metro.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 57
(c) The rate of conversion of agricultural and forest lands to urban  uses does not increase over
time in any major region of the state.
(3) Under the method adopted by the commission:
(a) A city’s determination of the amount of buildable lands [ needed for ] sufficient for needed
housing, employment and other urban uses must be based on the population and employment  growth
forecast to occur over a 14-year period.
(b) A city’s determination of the supply and development capacity  of lands within its urban
growth boundary must be based on:
(A) An inventory of vacant and  partially vacant buildable lands within the urban growth
boundary;
(B) The comprehensive plan designation and  the zoning of the portion of the buildable lands that
is urban; and
(C) Factors established by the commission for forecasting:
(i) The development and redevelopment capacity of urbanizable  lands within the urban growth
boundary; and
(ii) The redevelopment capacity of developed urban lands within the urban growth boundary.
(c) A city’s determination of the  supply and development capacity of lands the city proposes to
include within the urban growth boundary must be based on:
(A) An inventory of vacant and partially vacant lands; and
(B) Factors established by the commission for forecasting the  development and redevelopment
capacity of the lands.
(d) A  city shall consider a range or combination of measures identified by rule of the commission
to accommodate future need for land within the urban  growth boundary and implement at least one
measure or satisfy an alternate performance standard established by  the commission. The commis-
sion shall design the alternate  performance standard so that the standard is satisfied when the city:
(A) Has a development code that contains specified provisions designed to encourage  the de-
velopment of needed housing; and
(B) Demonstrates that, during the preceding planning period, the city:
(i) If located in the Willamette Valley, exceeded the median rate  of redevelopment and infill for
cities with a population  of 10,000 or [ more] greater in the Willamette Valley that are outside of the
boundaries of Metro by an amount set by commission rule; and
(ii) If located outside of  the Willamette Valley, exceeded the median rate of redevelopment and
infill for cities with a population of 10,000  or [ more] greater that are outside the Willamette Valley
by an amount set by commission rule.
(e) A city shall demonstrate that lands included within the urban growth boundary:
(A) Include sufficient serviceable land for at least a seven-year period.
(B) Can all be serviceable over a 14-year period.
(f) Lands included within the urban growth boundary:
(A) Must be planned and zoned for categories of land uses in amounts that are  roughly propor-
tional to the land need determined for each category of use;
(B) Must be planned and zoned for an intensity of use that  is generally consistent with the es-
timates that were used to determine the amount of land needed;
(C) Must be planned and zoned to meet the requirements  for needed housing, and those re-
quirements must be specified by rule of the commission in a manner that is as objective as  practi-
cable; and
(D) May be either:
(i) Planned and zoned, or otherwise conditioned, to avoid significantly affecting a  state highway,
a state highway interchange or a freight route designated in the Oregon Highway Plan; or
(ii) Allowed to significantly affect a state highway, a state  highway interchange or a freight
route designated in the Oregon Highway Plan subject  to mitigation, consistent with rules of the
commission, if the lands are planned and zoned for compact urban development or industrial uses.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 58
(4) For purposes of subsection (3)(a) of this section, population  growth must be forecast as pro-
vided in ORS 195.033. Employment growth must be forecast based on the population growth forecast
for the city or the employment growth forecast issued by the Employment Department for the county
or region. The commission shall establish factors, by rule, for  converting the forecasted population
and employment growth  into forecasts of land need for housing, employment and other categories
of uses. The factors must:
(a) Be based on an empirical evaluation of the relation between population and  employment
growth and the rate and trends of land utilization in the recent past in the  applicable major region
of the state;
(b) Reflect consideration by the commission of any significant  changes occurring or expected to
occur in the markets for urban land uses in that major region of the state;
(c) Be  designed to encourage an increase in the land use efficiency of a city, subject to market
conditions; and
(d) Provide a range of policy choices for a city about the form of its future growth.
(5) For purposes of subsection (3)(b) of this section, the commission shall establish factors  for
supply and development capacity that are:
(a) Based on an empirical evaluation of the population and employment growth that has  oc-
curred on similarly situated lands through development and redevelopment;
(b) Based on consideration by the commission of any  significant changes occurring or expected
to occur in the markets for urban land uses in that major region of the state;
(c) Designed to encourage an increase in the land use efficiency of the city, subject to market
conditions;  and
(d) Designed to provide a range of policy choices for a  city about the form of its future growth.
(6) For purposes  of subsection (3)(c) of this section, the commission shall establish factors that
are:
(a) Based on an empirical evaluation of the population and employment growth that has  oc-
curred on similarly situated lands through development and redevelopment;
(b) Based on consideration by the commission of any  significant changes occurring or expected
to occur in the markets for urban land uses in each major region of the state;
(c) Designed to encourage an increase in the land use efficiency of the city, subject to market
conditions;  and
(d) Designed to provide a range of policy choices for a  city about the form of its future growth.
(7) For lands that are included within an urban growth boundary pursuant  to this section and
not made serviceable within 20 years  after the date of their inclusion, the commission may provide
by rule that:
(a) The lands must be removed from within the urban growth boundary  the next time the city
evaluates the urban growth boundary; or
(b) The planned development capacity of  the lands must be reduced if there are significant in-
creases in the cost of making the lands serviceable.
(8) When lands  included within the urban growth boundary pursuant to this section are planned
and zoned for industrial or  residential uses, the lands must remain planned and zoned for the use
unless a rule of the commission allows a change  in planning and zoning based on a significant
change in circumstance.
SECTION 96.
ORS 197A.405, 197A.407, 197A.409, 197A.411 and 197A.413 are repealed.
SECTION 97. Any moneys remaining in the City  Economic Development Pilot Program
Fund on the effective date of this 2023 Act  that are unexpended, unobligated and not subject
to any conditions shall revert to the General Fund.
SECTION 98.  ORS 215.457 is amended to read:
215.457. A person may establish a youth camp:
(1) On  land zoned for forest use or mixed farm and forest use, consistent with rules adopted by
the Land Conservation and Development Commission.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 59
(2) On  land in eastern Oregon, as defined in ORS 321.805, that is zoned for exclusive farm use
and is composed  predominantly of class VI, VII or VIII soils, consistent with rules adopted by the
Land Conservation and Development Commission. However,  a person may not establish a youth
camp authorized under this subsection within an  irrigation district or within three miles of an urban
growth boundary as defined in  ORS [ 197.286] 197.015. A youth camp may be authorized under this
subsection only on a lawfully established unit of land as defined in ORS  92.010 of at least 1,000
acres.
SECTION 99.  ORS 215.501 is amended to read:
215.501. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Accessory dwelling  unit” means a residential structure that is used in connection with or
that is auxiliary to a single-family dwelling.
(b) “Area zoned for rural residential use” means land that is not located  inside an urban growth
boundary as defined in ORS [ 195.060] 197.015 and that is subject to  an acknowledged exception to
a statewide land use planning goal relating to farmland or forestland  and planned and zoned by the
county to allow residential use as a primary use.
(c) “Historic home” means a single-family dwelling constructed between 1850 and 1945.
(d) “New”  means that the dwelling being constructed did not previously exist in residential or
nonresidential form. “New”  does not include the acquisition, alteration, renovation or remodeling
of an existing structure.
(e) “Single-family  dwelling” means a residential structure designed as a residence for one family
and sharing no common wall with another residence of any type.
(2) Notwithstanding any  local zoning or local regulation or ordinance pertaining to the siting
of accessory dwelling units in areas zoned for rural residential use, a  county may allow an owner
of a lot or parcel within an area zoned  for rural residential use to construct a new single-family
dwelling on the lot or parcel, provided:
(a) The lot or parcel is not located in an area designated as an urban reserve as defined  in ORS
195.137;
(b) The lot or parcel is at least two acres in size;
(c) A historic home is sited on the lot or parcel;
(d) The owner converts the historic home to an accessory dwelling unit upon completion of the
new single-family dwelling; and
(e) The accessory dwelling unit complies with all applicable laws and  regulations relating to
sanitation and wastewater disposal and treatment.
(3) An owner that constructs a new single-family dwelling under subsection (2) of  this section
may not:
(a) Subdivide, partition or otherwise divide the lot or parcel so that the new single-family
dwelling is situated on a different lot or parcel from the accessory dwelling unit.
(b) Alter, renovate or remodel the accessory dwelling  unit so that the square footage of the
accessory dwelling unit is more than 120  percent of the historic home’s square footage at the time
construction of the new single-family dwelling commenced.
(c) Rebuild the accessory dwelling unit if the structure is lost to fire.
(d) Construct an additional accessory dwelling unit on the same lot or parcel.
(4) A county may require that a  new single-family dwelling constructed under this section be
served by the same water supply source as the accessory dwelling unit.
(5) A county may impose additional conditions of approval for construction of a new single-
family dwelling or conversion of a historic home to an accessory dwelling unit under this section.
SECTION 100.
 ORS 270.005 is amended to read:
270.005. For purposes of ORS 184.634, 270.005 to 270.015, 270.100  to 270.190, 273.416, 273.426 to
273.436 and 273.551:
(1) “Department” means the Oregon Department of Administrative Services.
(2) “Improvements” means any and all structures on or attachments to state-owned real  prop-
erty, but excluding public improvements as defined in ORS 279A.010.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 60
(3) “Real property” means all real property together with any and all improvements thereon.
(4) “Rural community” means an unincorporated community that consists primarily of perma-
nent residential dwellings but also has at least two other land uses that provide  commercial, in-
dustrial or public uses to the  community, the surrounding rural area or persons traveling through
the area.
(5) “Surplus real property” means all state-owned real property and  improvements surplus to
agency and state need.
(6) “Urban growth boundary” has the meaning given that term in ORS [ 195.060] 197.015.
(7) “Urban reserve” means any land designated as an urban reserve under ORS 195.145.
(8) “Urban unincorporated community” has the meaning given that term in ORS 197.015.
SECTION 101.
 ORS 466.055 is amended to read:
466.055. Before issuing a permit for a new facility  designed to dispose of or treat hazardous
waste or PCB, the Environmental Quality Commission must find,  on the basis of information sub-
mitted by  the applicant, the Department of Environmental Quality or any other interested party,
that the proposed facility meets the following criteria:
(1) The proposed facility location:
(a) Is suitable for the type and amount of hazardous waste or  PCB intended for treatment or
disposal at the facility;
(b) Provides the maximum  protection possible to the public health and safety and environment
of Oregon from release of the hazardous waste or PCB  stored, treated or disposed of at the facility;
and
(c) Is situated sufficient  distance from urban growth boundaries, as defined in ORS [ 197.286]
197.015, to protect the public health and safety, accessible by transportation routes that  minimize
the threat to the public health and safety and  to the environment and sufficient distance from parks,
wilderness and recreation areas to prevent adverse impacts on the public use and  enjoyment of
those areas.
(2) Subject to any applicable standards adopted under ORS 466.035, the design of the proposed
facility:
(a) Allows for treatment or disposal of the range of hazardous  waste or PCB as required by the
commission; and
(b) Significantly adds to:
(A) The range of hazardous waste or PCB handled  at a treatment or disposal facility currently
permitted under ORS 466.005 to 466.385; or
(B) The type of  technology employed at a treatment or disposal facility currently permitted un-
der ORS 466.005 to 466.385.
(3) The proposed facility uses the best available technology for  treating or disposing of hazard-
ous waste or PCB as  determined by the department or the United States Environmental Protection
Agency.
(4) The need for the facility is demonstrated by:
(a) Lack of  adequate current treatment or disposal capacity in Oregon, Washington, Idaho and
Alaska to handle hazardous waste or PCB generated by Oregon companies;
(b) A finding that operation of the proposed facility would result in a  higher level of protection
of the public health and safety or environment; or
(c) Significantly lower treatment or disposal costs to Oregon companies.
(5) The proposed hazardous waste or PCB treatment or disposal facility  has no major adverse
effect on either:
(a) Public health and safety; or
(b) Environment of adjacent lands.
SECTION 102.
 ORS 527.755 is amended to read:
527.755. (1) The following highways are hereby designated as scenic highways  for purposes of
the Oregon Forest Practices Act:
(a) Interstate Highways 5, 84, 205, 405; and
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 61
(b) State Highways 6, 7, 20, 18/22, 26, 27, 30, 31, 34, 35, 36, 38,  42, 58, 62, 66, 82, 97, 101, 126, 138,
140, 199, 230, 234 and 395.
(2) The purpose of designating scenic highways  is to provide a limited mechanism that maintains
roadside trees for the enjoyment  of the motoring public while traveling through forestland, consist-
ent with ORS 527.630, safety and other practical considerations.
(3) The State Board of Forestry, in consultation with the Department of  Transportation, shall
establish procedures and regulations as necessary to implement the requirements  of subsections (4),
(5) and (6) of this section, consistent  with subsection (2) of this section, including provisions for al-
ternate plans. Alternate plans that modify or waive the  requirements of subsection (4), (5) or (6) of
this section may be approved when, in the  judgment of the State Forester, circumstances exist such
as:
(a) Modification or waiver is necessary  to maintain motorist safety, protect improvements such
as dwellings and bridges, or protect forest health;
(b) Modification or waiver  will provide additional scenic benefits to the motoring public, such
as exposure of distant scenic vistas;
(c) Trees that are otherwise required to be retained will not be visible to motorists;
(d) The operation involves a change of land use that is  inconsistent with maintaining a visually
sensitive corridor; or
(e) The retention of timber in a visually  sensitive corridor will result in severe economic hard-
ship for the owner because all or nearly all of the owner’s property is within the  visually sensitive
corridor.
(4)(a) For harvest operations within a visually sensitive corridor, at least 50 healthy trees  of at
least 11 inches DBH, or that measure at  least 40 square feet in basal area, shall be temporarily left
on each acre.
(b) Overstory  trees initially required to be left under paragraph (a) of this subsection may be
removed when the reproduction understory reaches an average height of at least  10 feet and has
at least the minimum number of stems per acre of free to grow seedlings or  saplings required by the
board for reforestation, by rule.
(c) Alternatively, when the adjacent stand, extending from 150 feet from  the outermost edge of
the roadway to 300 feet from the outermost edge of the roadway, has  attained an average height
of at least 10 feet and has at least the minimum  number of stems per acre of free to grow seedlings
or saplings required by the board for reforestation, by rule, or at least 40 square feet of basal area
per acre, no trees are required to be left  in the visually sensitive corridor, or trees initially required
to be left under paragraph (a) of this subsection may be removed. When harvests within the  visually
sensitive corridor are carried out under this paragraph, the adjacent stand,  extending from 150 feet
from the outermost edge of the roadway to 300 feet from the outermost  edge of the roadway, shall
not be reduced below the  minimum number of stems per acre of free to grow seedlings or saplings
at least 10 feet tall required by the board for reforestation, by rule, or below 40 square feet of  basal
area per  acre until the adjacent visually sensitive corridor has been reforested as required under
subsection (6) of this section and the stand has attained an  average height of at least 10 feet and
has at least the minimum number of stems per acre.
(5) Harvest areas within a visually sensitive corridor shall be cleared of major  harvest debris
within 30 days of the completion of the harvest, or within 60 days of the cessation of active  har-
vesting activity on the site, regardless of whether the harvest operation is complete.
(6) Notwithstanding the time limits established in ORS  527.745 (1)(a), when harvesting within a
visually sensitive corridor results in a harvest type 1 or harvest type 3, reforestation  shall be com-
pleted by  the end of the first planting season after the completion of the harvest. All other pro-
visions of ORS 527.745 shall also apply to harvest type 1 or  harvest type 3 within visually sensitive
corridors.
(7) Landowners and operators shall not be liable for injury or damage caused by trees left within
the visually sensitive corridor for purposes of fulfilling the requirements of this section, when  car-
ried out in compliance with the provisions of the Oregon Forest Practices Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 62
(8) The following are exempt from this section:
(a) Harvest on single ownerships less than five acres in size;
(b) Harvest within an urban growth boundary, as defined in ORS [ 195.060] 197.015; and
(c) Harvest within zones designated for rural residential  development pursuant to an exception
adopted to the statewide land use planning goals under ORS 197.732.
SECTION 103.
 Section 6, chapter 552, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) Notwithstanding ORS 197.286 to 197.314, 197.626 or 197A.320 or any statewide  land
use planning goal related to housing or urbanization, the Department of Land Conservation  and
Development shall approve an expansion  of the urban growth boundary submitted by the city and
approved by the city by ordinance, if the department determines that:
(a) The department has received the letters required by section 4 , chapter 552,  Oregon Laws
2021 [ of this 2021 Act ];
(b) The department has approved the city’s conceptual plan under section  5 , chapter 552,
Oregon Laws 2021 [ of this 2021 Act ]; and
(c) The proposed urban growth boundary expansion adds  all of the Stevens Road tract and no
other lands to the area within the city’s urban growth boundary.
(2) The city shall include the lands brought within the city’s urban  growth boundary under this
section in the city’s inventory of buildable lands under [ ORS 197.296 (3)(a) ] section 22  of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 104. Section 9, chapter 552, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1) Notwithstanding ORS 197.250 or 197.612 or any statewide land use planning  goal, the
Department of Land Conservation and Development  shall approve Stevens Road planning amend-
ments provided the department determines, in its discretion, that the Stevens Road  planning
amendments, with respect to the Stevens Road tract, include:
(a) An inventory of significant historical artifacts, cultural sites and natural resources.
(b) Areas designated for recreational and open space.
(c) Land use regulations for the  protection and preservation of significant resources and desig-
nated areas identified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection.
(d) Land use regulations  that comply with applicable wildfire planning and development re-
quirements, including  requirements in regulations adopted to implement a statewide planning goal
relating to natural disasters and hazards.
(e) Areas designated for adequate employment lands  that account for the city’s most recent
economic opportunity analysis, including consideration of subsequent economic  development activ-
ities and trends.
(f) Within  areas zoned for residential purposes, without counting the lands designated under
subsection (2) of this section, land use regulations for housing that:
(A) Ensure adequate opportunities for the  development of all needed housing types, sizes and
densities of market-rate housing, including middle housing as defined in ORS 197.758;
(B) Exceed the  proportions of single-family attached and multifamily housing called for in the
city’s most recently adopted housing needs analysis under ORS 197.296 (3)  (2021 Edition);
(C) Exceed a minimum density standard of nine residential units per gross residential  acre; and
(D) On the date the Stevens Road planning amendments are  approved, comply with land use
regulations adopted by the city, or any minimum applicable rules  adopted by the department, to
implement ORS 197.758 and the amendments to ORS 197.312 by section 7, chapter 639, Oregon Laws
2019.
(g) Sufficient areas designated for mixed use development to support and integrate viable com-
mercial and  residential uses along with transportation options, including walking, bicycling and
transit use.
(h) Land use regulations ensuring that:
(A) Adequate capacity is available, or feasible with development, for water, sewer and  storm
water services; and
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 63
(B) Adequate consideration is given to the  financing, scheduling and development of urban ser-
vices, as defined in ORS 195.065.
(i) Land use regulations for transportation that:
(A) Ensure  the development of adequate infrastructure to support walking, bicycling, public
transit and motor vehicle movement; and
(B) Give adequate consideration to transportation networks that connect  the Stevens Road tract
to other areas within the urban growth boundary of the city.
(j) The adequate consideration of  the recommendations and comments received under section 8
(3) to (5) , chapter 552, Oregon Laws 2021  [ of this 2021 Act ].
(2) The department may not approve the  planning amendments under subsection (1) of this sec-
tion unless the planning amendments designate at least 20 net acres of land to be:
(a) Restricted so the area may be zoned, planned, sited or developed only  for residential housing
units at a minimum density of nine residential units per gross acre;
(b) Conveyed to the city at a price per acre established under section 4  (2)(b) , chapter 552,
Oregon Laws 2021 [ of this 2021 Act ]; and
(c) Notwithstanding ORS 91.225 or 197.309, preserved for a period of no  less than 50 years as
affordable to own or rent as follows:
(A) At least 12 net acres made affordable to:
(i) Households with incomes of 60 percent or less of  the area median income, as defined in ORS
456.270; or
(ii) If part  of an income-averaging program approved by the Housing and Community Services
Department, households whose incomes average 60 percent or less of the area median income.
(B) At least six net acres:
(i) Made  affordable to households with incomes of 80 percent or less of the area median income;
and
(ii) Made available, to the extent permitted by  law, in a manner that gives a priority to house-
holds in which at least one individual is employed by an education provider over other  members of
the public.
(C) At least two net acres in which at least 80  percent of the units in each contiguous devel-
opment tract are made affordable to households with 80 percent or less of the area median income,
of which at least one net acre  is made available, to the extent permitted by law, in a manner that
gives a priority to households in which at least one individual is employed by an education  provider
over other members of the public.
(3) Upon a partition or subdivision of the Stevens  Road tract following the approval of the
planning amendments under subsection (1)  of this section establishing one or more lots or parcels
described in subsection (2) of this section, the owner  shall transfer those lots or parcels to the city.
For a period of 99 years  after the purchase of property under this section, if the city resells any lot
or parcel, the city may recover only the city’s costs of the purchase and resale of the property.
(4) Neither the city nor the  Department of Land Conservation and Development is obligated to
adopt any specific findings or evaluate any specific  criteria in exercising its discretion with respect
to any Stevens Road planning amendments  under this section and may receive, solicit or consider
information from any source.
(5) As used in this section, “education  provider” means a school district as defined in ORS
332.002, an educational program under the Youth Corrections Education Program  or Juvenile De-
tention Education Program as both are defined in ORS 326.695, or an education service district  as
defined in ORS 334.003.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 105.
The unit captions used  in this 2023 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2023 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 64
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 106. This 2023 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 15, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2001 (HB 2001-B) Page 65